Why just the Conservatives?  Can't we stop the Anti-Science liberals as well?
Career options tend to be limited for a 20-year-old college student...
I don't know how it works in the UK, but in the US a defense lawyer could most likely get ahold of any CCTV footage.
Let's keep in mind, though, that "strategic" strikes are also intended to shut down an enemy country's capacity for industrial production, which tend to be based in large cities.  That doesn't, of course, make nuking cities "right," but it does fill a genuine military/strategic need.
Paradox Error in Line 0.
No, I'm disgusted that when a fellow Democrat speaks THE TRUTH about an issue like this, our Candidate runs for the hills, in fear of the Right Wing-Nut Fear Machine. Same bullshit that happened in 2004 when Kerry, the REAL Hero in Vietnam got swiftboated by the Wingnuts,  while Bush got a pass on going AWOL from the guard. Same fucking shit, 4 years later.   and I REALLY thought Obama had the balls to stand up to these assholes, the events of the past few weeks sure made me look like an asshole (FISA, IRAN, CLARK).   
How the hell can you NOT pop those?  My god that must take some self control...
Obvious Scarker is obvious.
Yes, important because it was bad. Without this grand idea, computer security would be 40 years ahead of where it was.
&gt;They have an emotional attachment to the idea of saving babies. It makes sense, in a way - We're wired by evolution to protect our young, etc.  No, they don't. They wouldn't be voting for policies that keep the abortion rate artificially high. Nor would they be supporting demands for women to die even if the babies can't be saved. They have an emotional attachment, all right, but it's to controlling and hurting women. They're likely programmed by their culture--and the casual acceptance of people like you--for it.  &gt;This is just your jaded outlook painting all of them with an over-broad brush.   This is why I say that your outlook is basically misogynist. Suppose your friends avidly supported a party calling for legislation that said every time a doctor had to choose between saving a black person and saving a white person, the doctor  had to ignore their relative medical situation and make the decision soley on skin color--always saving the white person and letting the black person die. Suppose their party went even further, and insisted that if the white person couldn't be saved, the doctor had to withhold treatment from the black person, too.  I am confident that if your friends were to embrace such a position, you wouldn't be here making excuse after excuse for them. I suspect that you would have no problem identifying their support of this party as evil, and that these people would no longer *be* your friends.  But since it's *only* women we're talking about--a group you perceive as of little relative worth, you find this all perfectly benign and acceptable.  Edited to add: By the way, ask your friends sometime if they'd be willing to support legislation to make child support retroactive from the moment of conception--and if it would be ok with them for the government to seize men's homes, vehicles, and boats if they don't pay up. Watch how quickly those same friends of yours who are willing to sacrifice a woman's very life will balk at this much being expected from a man.
I agree. You can write it almost exactly like Python (eg, without all the advanced Ruby features) for as long as you need.  And you don't have to worry about whitespace problems (anyone first starting with Python will invariably mix tabs and spaces somewhere or miss one space on some obscure line), not that the whitespace thing in Python is any sort of problem, it just catches beginners.  Also, you wont need to worry about what uses the instance method syntax and what uses the 'built-in' syntax.
Or if your neighbor plants some GM stuff and it cross-pollinates with your crop, then the company charges you for growing plants with their copyrighted genes.  That's just robbery.  The company should pay you for contaminating your crop with their uninvited property.
And your point is? Did all those missing frameworks made it harder or easier for me? What do you think? And are all these different frameworks really a good thing anyway? There were libraries back then, though. As were different "coding techniques". It was much fun to actually program the machine itself, enabling Mode X in Assembler or using interrupts. We really learned something about computers back then, instead of waging flame wars on the internet, endlessly debating about which of the newest toy language is the best.
I agree with the author:  adding more bureaucracy rarely makes a situation better for the public. 
The greatest idea in computer science is the two state switch (sometimes implemented in the real world as a transistor).
The UK's empire was falling apart through most of the 20th century.  But USAF_NCO is quite right. US power is absolutely formidable. One of the US fleet groups can go head to head with all other navies in the entire world combined. And to give you a picture of the might of the US navy then: The US has seven fleet groups.  Not to mention the 50 % of the world's entire military expenditure which the US has. Add the NATO countries to that, and you end up with 80-90 % of the entire world's military expenditure.   The military and economic power of the Western World is absolutely formidable and completely unrivaled in history, I'd dare say. Even the Romans had to fight with capable Germans, not to mention the large and powerful empire of the Parthians who repeatedly beat the Romans, even capturing one of their emperors. :D
"Munificent!"
You have to be a U.S. citizen at birth.  You could be born anywhere in the world, to U.S. parents, and qualify.  /pedantic
lol, no.  Take for example 7-11. I would assume that 7-11 buildings were built to be 7-11's. So your answer doesn't generalize to all cases. 
I would really like to see him pop them.
I don't believe I stated that "All religion is evil".  It is my position that all religions contain false beliefs.  Belief systems with false beliefs should be abandoned.  Saying "Fuck Religion" either in the particular or general is legitimate speech, since it encourages people to reject belief systems with false beliefs.   I'm not going to argue about religion much on here, but I am going to argue against censorship.  Since this article is really about the government repression of free speech in opposition to my wishes, rights, and the constitution of the United States.
Story unreadable due to high amount of British slang.
Yes, and so is every other presidential hopeful that actually stands a chance, from now until at least a decade into the future.  Change change change
You're not funny.
They will welcome us as Liberators ! (until they figure out we came as conquerers...)
Problem is, male geeks outnumber the female geeks 100:1 at least.
Are there any wealthy Lisp programmers? Cuz if not, I don't care.
you beat me to it. I was gunna post a link to lasanga cat...  One of the best is the Final Fantasy parody  http://youtube.com/watch?v=yELOiYgR2aI
If you have time, it is always good to learn a new language. A new programming language means needing to think about problem/solutions in a different way. It will teach you apply a different way of thinking in a larger scale when you program in Ruby.  Having said that, the answer depends on each person. Perhaps you are too busy to really dive into a new language. Perhaps you are looking for a language that will provide better career opportunities. Perhaps you want to learn a language that is radically different from Ruby.  Where are you coming from? Why are you interested in learning Python? What do you think you'll get out of it?
Why are you RaNdoMLY using the shift key as you type?
That was hilarious! "I sent you this email..." (goes to account, deletes email) "I don't see it here", "Oh, I guess I didn't send it".  I lol'd
 Huh!  Absolutely **Nothing**!  Oops, sorry, that's from a song about *war*, never mind.
Too bad he's on vacation :-/
Not to throw myself in with the biblethumpers here, but is this maybe just a little bothersome to anyone out there?
I suggested the Java version because the rest of the book has fewer typos than the other versions.
So no one else doubts the veracity of this?  Some of the tattoo pictures especially look photo-shopped. Plus yeah the timeline seems fishy.
And on pride weekend...
i'd read source code instead.
&gt;Same bullshit that happened in 2004 when Kerry, the REAL Hero in Vietnam got swiftboated by the Wingnuts, while Bush got a pass on going AWOL from the guard. What in the bloody hell are you talking about?  Obama never served in the military, whereas McCain was captured and tortured for years.  McCain IS a Vietnam vet, and in most people's eyes, a war hero. For Obama to attempt to smear McCain's record would make HIM the swiftboater.  It WOULD be the exact same bullshit - except with Obama as the bad guy.
ya tricking it into thinking there was glass in the screen when there was not.  O THE HUMANITY!
I dunno how you guys walk around with those things. 
Kudos for trying to change the look, but there's a reason dark themes are generally avoided and thus poorly supported. They suck. Oh sure, it's possible to make a dark theme that looks perfectly acceptable, but it's always possible to make a bright theme that looks better, and bright is much easier to read and easier on the eyes.
Total retard moment - what does the SU blind stand for? I know all the other sites/services/programs but I don't know what one.  Thanks.
The best way to diet is not to cut anything out completely, as you'll just crave it. I think he understands this.
the optimum age for this sort of IQ test is 21, give or take. So, this is very similar to mainstream IQ tests. It tests the g factor, which is basically a test of your buffer space for short term memory. Which is basically a joke when you want to talk about real wisdom, real big picture sort of intelligence. This is really just mental gymnastics.  and to answer your questions, the closer your score is to about 21 or thereabouts, the better you did.   Of course, real wisdom and insight comes only with age and exposure to ever more and more knowledge and facts.
Um... ftr, I really doubt many people make vote-up posts for the sake of karma (unless they wanted less karma, as the average vote-up story tanks b/c of 'users like you!').  I have a gut feeling that taking karma away for self posts was at least partially related to placating the greasy wheels on reddit.  But now, I'm going to have the play the hypocrit card... (via complaining about complaining) and tell you (and all the other complainers) to **shut up already** (I can use bold too!!! :P).   It's obvious that the majority of reddit users don't care about vote-up posts... as witnessed by the fact that the day after the karma change was instituted, three vote-up posts were on the front page.  And if you really care all that much, since reddit is a democracy, without minority protections, you and other complainers, as the minority, are the ones who will end up having to adapt.  I suggest you become familiar with the firefox extensions Greasemonkey, or Stylish - both of which should allow you to never see a vote up post ever again.  edit: as an afterthought - would it be possible to make reddit such that one of the preferences for users would be to not show any post with the words 'vote up' in the title? Reddit's open source now, but I would have no idea where to start. Any takers? This way, I wouldn't have to hear people complaining as much, and the unusually angry complainers would be happy as well, and continue using reddit, making everyone happy!
Watterson?
Right, but breathing air eventually kills the entire experimental group also.
I guess that's politics, it's only an issue until it works in your favor. 
The article is about GM research that intends to provide all that other stuff. Interesting.  You should read it.
Resist. Refuse to acknowledge them. Have them take you downtown. After taking 20,000 people downtown, perhaps they will see some kind of smidgeon of a beginning of a clue.
Oh my god! My waffle....
and *I* call epic luls!
Thankyou for adding absolutly nothing of any sort of value to this message thread.
For anyone who thinks WTC 7 is just another conspiracy theory in the overwhelming pile of evidence that is the 911 cover-up I would direct you here [http://www.ae911truth.org/](http://www.ae911truth.org/).  No this isn't another Alex Jones mirror site.  The founder of this site, Richard Gage is an architectural engineer, and not an unemployed engineer, but a sought after person who heads multimillion dollar projects.  The membership is of the same vocation and none of their findings are based on rumor or theory, they are based on applied engineering and site evidence that is irrefutable.  Read some of what they have to say, and then tell me that *I'm* the one who'll believe just about anything.  Perhaps it's the other way around?
im 21, it said i have the brain of a 32 year old...should i buy a convertible?
For PHP: --PHP Architect Guide to PHP Design Patterns --Object Oriented PHP Concepts Techniques and Code --PHP and MySQL Web Development --PHP Cookbook --PHP 6 and MySQL 5 for Dynamic Web Sites: Visual QuickPro Guide(Looks pretty promising -- briefly scanned through it and it had some good information)  For JS/AJAX: --AJAX and PHP: Building Responsive Web Applications --Ajax Security --Pro Ajax and Java Frameworks --For beginners check out extJS and read the API/documentation... very helpful in building a strong foundation and understanding  For Ruby: --Beginning Ruby: From Novice to Professional(*Note - I'm by no means a pro at ruby, but the times I've gotten to use it, this book has been great about guiding along)
What if we did go to war though? that would be practically it for the middle east. Who the hell else would we attack? I suppose Syria or Pakistan, but still. That's like the end of the line.
Everything was possible those days to defeat the enemy. Unlike today where soldiers have to account about how many bullets they used in a firefight and afterwards, according to the new US Supreme Court resolution, they might have to gather the spent casings as evidence for detaining a terrorist.
Oh, for God's sakes. You fucking kids and your Obama. He's the same as everyone else.
Well if they were to say there is a link they would be cast from the scientific community as outliers.  They know what is expected during these times.
That's basically where I'm coming from as well; every time you see a judge or an attorney being charged with DUI, they refused everything. In my state, Ohio, refusal means an automatic 1 yr. suspension, so you better be pretty sure you'd blow over, but they've started charging people with OVI anyway even if you do blow under the limit. Forced blood draws are fortunately not allowed in Ohio yet, though they're pushing for it. The point is, if they've pulled you over and request you complete field sobriety tests, they've decided you're going downtown for it anyway. Might as well not help them in gathering evidence by trying to stumble through tests in the hopes of them letting you off the hook.
Indeed, he will be missed. But alas, all good things come to an end eventually. In the end, it's probably just *Earth plus Plastic*.
There's an ad or something on that page that keeps causing it to reload the main page over and over.  Ick.
and motor oil is the new NASA
&gt;Whilst you may like to think  At least 2 people thought it was funny as of right now.
"Sorry, I'm gay" would be funnier...
yes, your dollars are worth less day by day... switch to euros to protect value?
Not that I'm condoning doing so, but think about it. We'd control the whole damn place.
And you're not pretty, but sometimes I have moments.
That's curious.  Because I've created FAT32 drive systems of 16GB and more.  They don't show any signs of instability as I've filled them.
heat vision.  it doesn't make any sense, really.
Best part, by far, is where he goes into the other guy's email and deletes from his "sent" folder.
Same thing happened when I owned a Jeep. They broke in, stole everything in the glovebox, cut my seatbelts in half, and cut up the padding on the roll bar. I hope they had fun with the owners manual.  I haven't owned a convertible since. Last year some asshole broke my window to steal my GPS. The window was $1500 to replace and the GPS was worth may e $200. Assholes!
If you are interested in seeing just how much the civil liberties has eroded and been taken away in England I can recommend the documentary "Taking Liberties", quite an eye-opener. http://www.imdb.com/title/tt0977667/
They can run the same applications?  Gee.  News to me.  Wine is a technically fascinating compat layer, but for practical everyday use, I've found its practical applications to be limited.  Its functioning is really hit-or-miss.  However, I do agree with you to some degree; ReactOS is going to have a really hard time getting a wide audience.  They don't have the dev team size to compete with Unix-likes and Microsoft successfully, and I don't see that changing.  Also, Windows NT is a questionable architecture; per se, it _may_ be passable, but the levels of backwards compatibility they needed breaks any possible architectural advancements they have made since 9x.  Even Microsoft has implicitly admitted that with projects such as Singularity.  Also eventually, they're going to draw Microsoft's ire, and since they're always going to be playing catch-up by the very nature of what they're doing, they'll have a hard time keeping up with the inevitable evasion tactics that Microsoft will take even assuming they don't attempt to legally crush the ReactOS project.  I'm not saying that they should stop, however; indeed, it's technically a very interesting project, and may very well succeed.  It wouldn't be the first time a nay-sayer has been tragically wrong.
There are 10 counties in Alabama where the majority of people are black.  Overall in the state 27% of the people are black.  They seem to be ok.  There is no mass exodus to the enlightened north.  I certainly don't want to speak for them, and I would really like to hear a countering opinion if anyone there is listening.  But it seems to me that your claim might be bogus.
hmmm, meta-downmodded?
I am more excited than scared but scared to be excited. 
Reductio ad absurdum works... If everyone had a trillion dollars, do you think you could still pay someone $5/hr to work?
ROFLMAO.
&gt; Not a particularly friendly weapon,  As opposed to other weapons, which spend their time helping old ladies cross the street and rescuing kittens.
If the cops behavior played a part in this kid's death, which it seems it did from the witness' standpoint, then it's the second death caused by police following a sports victory by a Boston team this decade. Cops here (and I bet in most places) have a serious attitude problem where they believe they are the judge, jury and executioner. This shit needs to stop. How come the state spends millions of dollars protecting corporate property during these events but fails to police the city and protect us from gang violence?   How about they spend all that cash putting officers on the streets of Dorchester, the murder capital of New England, rather than policing storefronts.
Stumble Upon.  What was the W one?
i've been desperately trying to get into what.cd I seriously need an invite. Public trackers are shit for music.
Sure, My grandfather used to talk about working for a few dollars a week during the depression.   It wasn't all inflation either. They knew what it was like to be hungry.
http://img154.imageshack.us/img154/8622/dogdancexp7.gif
 Perhaps "mindlessly pro-business" is more descriptive of the problem than anti-science.  Of course right after than you get into "mindlessly pro-creative design" and I guess you're right, it's easier just to go with anti-science.
Fuck.  Me.
&gt;Statistics show it isn't happening because we're currently following your method of learning - preventing kids from having actual experience with managing their own finances before college.  That's like saying our high rate of road fatalities is a result of there being driving school.  &gt;You can't incur debts with a debit card.  But you can make foolish financial decisions with it.  &gt;If the parents are a party to it, IT TEACHES NOTHING.   That's counter to popular consensus. You have some kind of study or research that proves this?  &gt;They could ask their children. And if their children wanted help, they would ask for it.   This one proves it: you *definitely* have no experience with children.  &gt;Remember earlier when I said "If you give a child $5 and make them put it in a savings account, they learn nothing"? I meant that and it's true.  Really? You mean that a 7-year old hasn't the cognitive skills to see how subsequent deposits add up, that interest can accrue, and that delayed gratification can reap huge results?  &gt;And when you got away from your father, and started riding in places where your father wasn't around, you took off the safety gear.  No, but I suspect you might have. You see, I not only saw that it was an effective way to protect myself--I also had no reason not to. Unlike you, I had adult figures around me who helped to guide me through issues like this. I never felt that not wearing a helmet was "bad". I just thought it was stupid not to.  &gt;Their parents force them to wear safety gear when they are around. So when they go out on their own, they shed the gear in a desire to lead their own life.  Were you potty-trained at gunpoint? Why do you assume every child has to rebel against even sensible lessons they've learned as they grow up? You do realize that there is a middle way, don't you?   &gt;You weren't helping yourself pulling the "you don't have kids" bullshit. That's an ad hominem attack and makes anything you say following that logically completely illegitimate.  It doesn't make it illegitimate. My point was that your argument deviates so far from practical experience as to suggest you have no practical experience with what you advocate.
Steve, why such negativity?  It says on your blog that you like poker twice so you must be that good that you are deriving 50% of your income from playing?  My ROI when playing is 58.6% over the last year.  I average about $125 an hour playing.  I've had 8 loser sessions out of 46 in the last 3 months.  Share your stats...  The whole point of the blog is to share my experiences, take it or leave it.  But, at least be a man about it and post your responses on the blog.  The whole point of that post, btw, was upping the social aspects of the game which minimize the random elements.  If all you do is sit and calculate your EV, you're missing the most important aspect of the game: psychology.  But, my guess is that you're a home gamer or internet grinder, so that shit is a concept lost on you.  If you'd like to prove me wrong, I'll be in AC all of July and Vegas all of August.  Proof is in the pudding.
Hitler! (Pre-emptive Godwin.)
Ya think he draws for fun still, or when something especially funny hits him?
Thats 2 questions but I venture YES is the answer
I would exclude trailing punctuation from the link unless the entire sentence is linked. Examples:  * [This is correct.](http://www.reddit.com/goto?id=6pogc) * This [is too](http://www.reddit.com/goto?id=6pogc). * But not [this.](http://www.reddit.com/goto?id=6pogc)
Sales tax, that's why.
Sometimes?
You can make the drive (or partition) 16GB, but you can't put a 16GB file on it.
Oho, you had me for a minute there.
You little shit.
I disagree with Dawkins that the "honest creationist" has not undergone torture ala Winston from 1984. To a sincere believer in the Bible who also dreams of being a scientist, resolving the conflict between the two would be akin to torture. A personal, mental, spirtual kind of torture that would crack even the greatest of minds.  Its one thing I see many evolutionists fail to appreciate about those scientists who cling to creationism or intelligent design. Asking them to give up their beliefs is NOT a casual thing. As well to ask someone to give up breathing.
Would the random use of bold and italics have help my point?
Education and experience are not mutually exclusive though.. I've built up 3 years of experience in both research + commercial settings. As do many other students so they have a head start over other fresh graduates. I think each year of part time work counts as ~6 months of full time at least. Add a couple of full time summer jobs, plus hobbyist projects and it's not really so bad. I'd say half of what I know came through other routes than courses.
nevermind.  I tried again, did better and got a 25.
Why would anyone take a picture of their dead infant posed with a teddy bear and post it online?  I understand that people need to grieve in their own ways, but that's just wrong.  I rarely find anything I see online disturbing, but this site is far beyond creepy.
You can have my time machine.  This must be done, recorded, and put on youtube.
It claims to calculate the brain's age, it doesn't tell you that it's calculating overall intelligence.  The older the brain is, the worse it gets at these sorts of tasks as it loses it's fluid memory.  Complaining about these sorts of tests is sour grapes from people who overvalue age as the only barometer of experience/wisdom.
Keep it in cash unless you can readily convert to Euros or pounds
Apparently humans don't agree with you.
Ruby and Python are both equivalent languages. However, Python is years ahead in terms of performance, libraries and stability. Both languages are similar enough that a programmer could easily switch between them. If you are a Rubyist, Python might save your neck if you ever hit one of the limitations that Ruby currently suffers from.
Flash Memory Game Raises My Blood Pressure.
I'm actually conservative myself,and find it a twisted form of entertainment on Reddit or Digg.
Hey I was just reading about [you](http://www.reddit.com/info/6pn0w/comments/c04ja9s)!!  You seem cordial enough to me, and unworthy of being categorized with p3do.  
But i'm colorblind
And how do you think religion keeps going?  http://www.child-bible-lessons.com/childbibleverses.html
I like how every once in a while you see one of the kids look around to see if they're doing it right.
well prhps you should lk thm up.
I hate to break it to you, but although Bush is the overseer of everything, the executive branch has very, very little power.  If you're going to blame anyone, blame congress for writing all the damn bills and then passing them up to him.  
Meaning: no lasting effects. Perfect for a practical joke.  
Gotta love it when the Karma Police come to town.
Exactly. What kind of people using Google to find porn?
I will make the sex tonight. In the morning I will test your hypothesis and give you the results. 
the best i got was 25 but the average wat 30
These days, anyone who doesn't already have a defense lawyer (and keep his card handy) is a fool.  (If anyone in New Hampshire wants me to recommend a *really* good one, please ask.)
Is Lisp O(1)?
no, I got 120.  And thats cuz I got em all wrong :&lt;
What puzzles me is this - let's say we do have a massive crash due to Credit Card debt, and millions of people default.  They essentially get off scott-free, while the economy tanks... 
I don't necessarily agree with any ideas that Heinlein presents in Starship troopers, but I am all for calling a Spade, a Spade. The article from space.com you linked completely ignores the fact that its civil service, not just military. One can choose other things besides the military to earn citizenship. Military service is followed in the story probably for no better reason its probably a lot more interesting than writing about being an office clerk.   Militarism is the hardly the core ideology of fascism. Israel, South Korea, Greece, Algeria, Hungary, Germany, Croatia, Armenia, Switzerland, Turkey, Taiwan, Chile and Nicaragua are all democratic nations with mandatory military or civil service (at current). None of these nations are fascist, despite the fact that some, such as Israel, could easily be described as very militant.   Even what is construed as racism can just as easily be seen as standard military lingo. We called Germans "fritz', we called the Viet Cong 'charlie'. Using a placeholder name does not by default mean racism.   The entire article is based on thin links and often leaves entire points out to smooth over the argument. The only way you are going to find fascism in Starship Troopers is if you are looking for it and creating those links. No different then I could find homosexual allusion in Dr. Jekyl and Mr Hyde, or eroticism in Dracula if I really wanted to. Just because a cherry picked arguement can be made, it doesn't support a cohesive thesis. 
A girl!!!!! Giiiirrrrrllllllll!! AHhhhHHHHHHHhhhhhHHHHH
Given how much people are expected to experiment now days, and how he does have that elitist touch, are we supposed to believe he's never once tried sucking cock?
I think it's sweet he shot the whole thing in IMAX format. He is right on the money how fake movies are starting to look even with top notch CG ie. new Indiana Jones, or Star wars. People are going to start getting more picky about the way movies are shot in the next few years and in the next decade people will be able to afford camera's like the ones they use for movies and create a whole new era of movies. 
The top predator being us.  Of course unlike most predators, we predate ourselves.
I had an iPhone for a while after Christmas but before that I hadn't had a phone for so long I didn't want to put anyone's number in there, read: I didn't want them to get a hold of me. I finally just stopped paying for talk time and basically use it as an ultra-portable laptop. I pay for internet and that's about it.
And then when it finally turns up you feel guilty for playing with it obsessively.
&gt; We really learned something about computers back then, instead of waging flame wars on the internet, endlessly debating about which of the newest toy language is the best. That is exactly my point :-)
320k acres are really not that many. That many acres just burned in California in the last 2 weeks. Better than nothing of course
Perhaps.  But these don't even look like new ones.  Just a collection of existing ones I've seen before ...
Another amazing property of e can only be understood if you know calculus.  If you have an exponential function, y = b^x, the derivative (by using that limit of the difference quotient) is y' = (lnb) b^x.  Normally, the graph of a function and the graph of its derivative don't look much alike, but in this case, they are just multiples of each other.  For example, since ln 2 is approximately 0.69, the derivative of  y = 2^x is y' = 0.69* 2^x, and the graph of y' lies below the graph of y.  On the other hand, ln 3 is approximately 1.01, so in this case y = 3^x and y' = 1.01* 3^x, and the graph of y' lies above the graph of y. For the amazing value of e, ln e is exactly equal to 1, so y = e^x and y' = 1* e^x --the graphs of y and y' are exactly the same!  This turns out to be very useful in later applications.
Elementary my dear Dr...
I can vouch that it happens for circumcised guys as well. 
Goddamn Moral Majority got this one right.
What? Are you saying that Reddit might have exaggerated a news story in a very biased light? No way.  Next you're going to be telling me that 911 wasn't a controlled demolition?
Heh.  I don't suppose you're up for nomination for, I dunno, lumping me in with the baby rapist, eh?
  SWAT Summit is the premier conference focused on advertising and marketing on social networks.  Our conference looks at how agencies and brands can harness the power of social networks. This conference ideal for anyone who wants to be a leader in the next generation of marketing and advertising -- and for the publishers, developers, and ad networks who will work with them hand in hand.  Speakers   * David Smith, CEO, MediaSmith  * Misha Cornes, Group Dir. of Strategy, Organic  * Carolyn Dangson, Research Analyst, IDC  * Sonya Chawla, Managing Director of Advertising, Slide  * Christian Perry, Head Business Guy, Room Full of People  * Seth Goldstein, CEO, SocialMedia  * Chris Cunningham, CEO, AppsSavvy  * Helen Har, VP Sales West, imeem  * Ian Swanson, CEO, Sometrics  * Kevin Barenblatt, CEO, Context  * Steve Polsky, COO, Flixster  Agenda   8:30 - Registration and Networking  9:30 - What Brands Can Learn from Obama  10:00 - US Consumer Behaviors and Attitudes about Social Networking  10:30 - Coffee Break  10:45 - Social Networking Case Studies  11:45 - Social Networks and the 8 Levels of User Engagement  12:30 - Lunch  1:30 - The Science of Measuring Campaign Success (User Metrisc &amp; Engagement)  2:30 - Connecting Social with Advertising  3:15 - Coffee Break  3:45 - Best Practices in Social Network Advertising  4:45 - The Last Word  5:00 - Cocktail Reception  For information about the event, go to http://www.swatsummit.com  Discounts  If you work at a startup, ad agency, or major brand, please email Cassie Phillipps at cep [at] rfop [dot] biz for a $150 discount off the admission price.
I scored really high but forgot what my score was.
I'm not sure what that's like, since I never was much of a Christian (same logic that killed Santa took out the easter bunny and God in one fell swoop).  It must be interesting to see the entire world click together into an entirely different configuration one day.  
I can't believe how often you see that nonsense on DailyKos, arguably some of the partisan "Bush haters" out there.
Why it gets dialogue started. If you think they should put a poll in the thread options why don't you just...vote up
Boil, oiled, smothered in honey - honestly, does it make a difference if the end result if the skin is still lickable?
And Linux and BSD are not open source how? Frankly the author should cease his work and just move over to the large projects where his skills can be put to use.
In the ~$800 range your choices are so numerous as to be mind numbing.  If you're going to commute for real in Seattle consider the following: - full fenders (screw the wind resistance... it's worth the 1 or 2 miniutes of your time to arrive without a mud strip front and back)... might as well throw in some rain gear depending on how hard core you are.  - good front and rear lights (riding the Burke-Gilman trail can get really dark sometimes under the trees and behind hills during the morning and evening commute),   - a comfortable saddle (if you're actually going to commute *every* *single* *day* you have no idea how important this is),   - a nice low set of gears (lots of hills depending on your point A, point B situation); I might even go as far as to say consider an electric bike (depending on how many hills and your ability to tolerate them).  - some type of shoe-peddle clipping system  - a waxed chain... about every 6 months  In fact, since most bikes are not sold in this type of condition, I'd suggest spending $600 on the bike, then pimp it out with an extra $200 of shit you'll need and sell of the the crap you replace so you can buy anything else I may have missed with the proceeds. 
Mortis the safety tortoise? 
As long as you can zoom out a decent bit I'll be happy.  Which you won't be able to.  (For arguably good reasons.)  So I guess I'll have to be somewhat satisfied.
Dear Internet,  Please stop making broad claims you don't actually know anything about.  In particular, claiming that Lisp is functional just because it supports functional programming is endlessly frustrating to me.  Lisp is a multi-paradigm language - you can write imperative, logical, functional, or object-oriented code in it.  Were you thinking of Scheme, perhaps?  Either way, dear Internet, I hope you've learned something.  Love and kisses, agnoster  P.S. This isn't meant as a diss to functional languages, it's just a correction.
Wordpress, blogging site
And what makes IV1ax reddit's biggest fucking fuckbag?
Wikipedia, and thanks!  Edit: it's wordpress!  My mistake. I don't notice ad's and logos as much as the average bear, I tuned them out long ago to avoid insanity.
That *might* just be because Perl is still around and you can still use it just as well as ever, and people are happily using it.
I knew that.
Do you have a good lawyer? If not you're just blowing smoke.
And the internets.
Yeah, you and conspiracy_theorist figured out the whole 9/11 thing now with the shocking revelation that Bin Laden isn't on the FBI website... How did people missed it so far? Take that, mainstream media (and suck on this, common sense)!
I am tired of these motherfucking shrimps on this motherfucking treadmill!
Maybe our older people just have a fetish for younger people?
Gay.
As I remember, it didn't need to carry any warhead. In fact, to attack the enemy, you'd just have it orbit the target for a few day.
Can these comments be sorted by penis?
&gt;It claims to calculate the brain's age, it doesn't tell you that it's calculating overall intelligence.  Some characteristics of some "things" are directly related, and so therefore if you measure characteristic X, where X is 2Y, then when you measure X, you also measure Y.   G factor is what is measured here because your score here is dependent on your brain's short term memory buffer, which varies with age.   G factor is also what is measured in mainstream IQ tests. 
Adobe is a good example, actually. I guess, you can't really make the big buck with "snappy" software. 
The same can be said about Warcraft, but from Warcraft 2, to Warcraft 3 there were significant changes that made it an entirely different game, The hero system. I haven't heard much really that different about Starcraft 2, although I am sure by release it will have a fair amount.
Yeah, that's broken as fuck, but thanks for trying.  What the hell, Mozilla.
Another example of the American legal system at its finest.  Other examples include Rodney King, Amadou Diallo, etc.
now can we get something useful like streaming movies that don't require windows media player?
Scientography.
It's definitely worth it to learn Python. Unfortunately it might be painful. I started with Python, got a job, found Ruby but still have to use Python at work.  The syntax annoys the hell out of me. I've been in discussions about it on reddit before - it basically comes down to:   len( some_list )  vs   some_list.length  ... the former is the Python which is really just syntactic vinegar for `some_list.__len__()` ... Yea... I don't know either. Just go with it. Python is much faster and has far more mature libraries, that's what's going to be useful.
most of these pictures are not from "everyday winter". its mostly "the day after a nasty ice storm". 
We can have good if we work at it where it's possible. We won't if we spread too thin.
Yet if they had the capability to do so, but chose not to, I'd say their species had done a fair amount of exploring and knowledge building.
Wasn't there just an article about a dude who got life for 0.03g meth? 
If I am a "fruitcake" are you suggesting that I'm gay?  Or that I am a delicious treat to be shared at Christmas?  Or that I'm an idiot that is to be ignored because of my interest in freedom of speech and religious issues?
You are ready to spar with Monzy:  [kill-dash-nine](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Fow7iUaKrq4)
Haven't you guys heard, the new fad is **HEAVY WATER**, it's sooooo good, which is why it's so expensive. It's invigorating, and leaves you feeling radiant!  http://www.medicalisotopes.com/search_cat.asp?find=22  Come on people, let's get this shit on the market, and we won't have to hear about these idiots any more!  &gt; Experiments in mice, rats, and dogs[6] have shown that a degree of 25% deuteration causes (sometimes irreversible) sterility, because neither gametes nor zygotes can develop. High concentrations of heavy water (90%) rapidly kills fish, tadpoles, flatworms, and drosophila. Mammals such as rats given heavy water to drink die after a week, at a time when their body water approaches about 50% deuteration.
Less talking about code, more coding.
I don't understand this hatred people have for Ayn Rand's books. She was an idealist, and her philosophy does not survive harsh reality. But I don't understand why everyone thinks her philosophy begets assholes, or attracts assholes.  People latch on to a single tenet of Rand's philosophy: selfishness. They conveniently ignore other integral parts, like honesty and reason. Good people can be drawn to her philosophy, and every philosophy or religion has its own share of assholes. Personally I'm of the opinion that Objectivism is not a bad personal philosophy, but it's a poor foundation for religion or government, because it's too idealistic... the philosophy fails to account for the reality of humanity. There will never be a community that would function well under the tenets of Objectivism.  But as a personal philosophy, and ideal to strive for, it's not bad. Be completely honest, don't delude yourself, don't support leeches. While many have taken Rand to be saying 'charity is evil', a more accurate interpretation would be 'continuing to help those who choose not to help themselves is harmful to both parties'. There is nothing wrong with giving someone shelter for a night, or helping someone who cannot help you back. But to continue to support someone who repeatedly does nothing in return, and does not seek to support themselves, makes them dependant on you... they are less of a person, and you are less able to provide wealth to society.  Helping your brother get back on his feet... good. Supporting your brother for years while he drinks beer on your couch... bad. And this is something that is a pretty commonly held view... it was not original with Ayn Rand; many people have repeated this piece of advice over the years, under many guises. "Give a man a fish/Teach a man to fish" is another way to word the same philosophy.  I think big 'L' libertarians tend to be assholes... not sure why. Maybe because the **L**ibertarian party is supported by big business that loves being unregulated and uncontrolled; an amoral bias is sure to creep in, and their public adoption of Objectivism causes a lot of mixing between the two groups... asshole by association? A true libertarian party would accept that externalities need to be regulated by government, since everyone is not a perfectly rational completely informed consumer.  Ahh well. To summarize: Objectivism is probably not the same philosophy you think it is if you think everyone that likes it must be an asshole. And Ayn Rand, long winded and pedantic though her books may be, put out some very interesting ideas that do have merit. Dismissing it as fodder for assholes is a really big put-down, considering how many thousands, millions, of people read and enjoyed those books. Don't be so narrow minded.
Sorry, but it happens on Fox and MSNBC, too. Of course they have interns sitting around scoping out these things.
I was wondering the same, anyone have any sort of explanation?
I just loved the bit about "Tyson Homosexual".
:)  I see more!  Didn't bother reading the article... so much to do in a day!
I hate my cell phone.  I carry it in case I crash while cycling.
Filmmaker Joel Christian McEwan is in the process of developing American Dream, a documentary film which will examine America's obsession with material possessions and the corporate culture that fuels and profits from that obsession. Featuring Danny Glover, Ed Begley Jr., Jean Kilbourne, Howard Zinn and many others, American Dream will try to make sense America's consumer culture, it's causes and its effects. And he needs our help.
Oh. This is so sad.  Stargate Continuum comes out in a month, and he's in that. General Hammond's last appearance. :(
Your selective quoting boggles the mind.  The VERY NEXT SENTENCE is: &gt;However, the US Centers for Disease Control studied the blood of these individuals and concluded there was no evidence that the reactions people experienced were associated with hypersensitivity to the starlink protein. I mean, did you honestly think that no one would bother clicking the link? 
Or God forbid cross the swords.
pre OM NOM NOM NOM
All the more reason to encrypt your sensitive documents. Encryption keys are protected under the fifth amendment. http://news.cnet.com/8301-13578_3-9834495-38.html
One thing I've noticed about Southerners is that they think race is only about black and white...
good point.  Or *any* democrat.  the noise machine would be churning about *anyone* we would select.  i mean, last time we nominated an old white war hero, and how did that work out in terms of the rumors?  If I recall correctly, that slander campaign added a new word to our dictionaries.
What got me were the ones in obvious states of decay.
Let the rationalization begin!  LBJ was such a great guy, if Obama flip-flops half as much as him, he'll be the best president ever!
Anyone interested in compilers should read the papers Ken Thompson wrote about the Plan 9 compilers:  * [A New C Compiler by Ken Thompson](http://doc.cat-v.org/bell_labs/new_c_compilers/) * [The Plan 9 C Compilers by Ken Thompson](http://doc.cat-v.org/plan_9/4th_edition/papers/compiler)  Their design (and implementation) is very elegant and simple, cross compilation is the only kind of compilation making portability much easer (it is ~5000 lines of common code plus around the same per architecture for the compilers, and a bit less for the linkers), has been ported to at least a dozen different architectures, and it is incredibly fast (can build a whole Plan 9 kernel in &lt;1 minute in an ancient thinkpad 600E (the compilers are typically io bound anyway).
[So is William Shatner.](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=KM6pYG1DQ4s)
Java:  * Effective Java Programming Language Guide,  Second Edition, by Joshua Bloch * Core Java, Volumes 1 and 2, by Horstmann and Cornell  Python:  * Learning Python, Third Edition, by Mark Lutz * Programming Python, Third Edition, by Mark Lutz  These aren't language oriented, but they belong on every programmer's bookshelf anyway:  * Code Complete, Second Edition, by Steve McConnell * Design Patterns by Erich Gamma, et al.
Yeah, you telling me you saw right through their 'WMDs in Iraq' trick straight from the start?  Cleverass, well done!
I'm 23 and I have a brain age of 20.  Does that mean I can date college freshman?
I think you just got the high score of all time on reddit for blatant fallacies [This](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/List_of_fallacies) needs to be required reading on reddit to avoid posts such as yours.  &gt;so you want creationism taught in public schools then?  [Appeal to ridicule fallacy](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Appeal_to_ridicule)  &gt;I have plenty of evidence, but im not going to waste time  [I don't suffer fools like you fallacy](http://c2.com/cgi/wiki?IdontSufferFoolsLikeYou)  &gt;some internet troll  [Ad Hominem fallacy](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Ad_hominem)  &gt;99.5% of all historians agree   [Appeal to authority fallacy](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Appeal_to_authority)  &gt;unless you're like a creationist,  ["No True Scottsman" fallacy](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/No_true_Scotsman)
FYI, the rapper is Rebel XD.
Researchers have identified “fat compartments” in the face that make babies look adorable and boost the appeal of stars such as Angelina Jolie and Audrey Hepburn. Plumping them out makes look younger and a bit more like Jolie or Hepburn, plastic surgeons say. (Post has scads of Angelina photos from 1982 to 2008)
I was worried that the workaround was going to involve cutting old people's faces off.
Yes.
if it was orca, i would have written "best free stuff ever"
They probably smoke salvia beforehand or something.
It said my brain's age was 22, I'm 39. I'm gonna interpret that as a good thing.
Pretty Creepy LG ad imo
Where was this?
...cops with tasers kill people.
I think IV1ax may have called tullypimp reddit's biggest douchebag. I could be wrong since you can't follow the link from IV's submission.
Wow. Mention Lieberman and all conspiracy theorist, nutcases and racists  - usually all in one - come out of their ratholes.. (Or rather stay in their stinking basements and post links to whatreallyhappened.com)  Having a field day, huh? 
When they stop updating XP I shall switch to Ubuntu. Goodbye Micro$oft makers of faulty and bloated software that you over charge for. 
the last pic should read stunned, that pic is far from stunning.
I've had a Vespa for a out 3 years, have ridden much further than 4k (lot further) and no accidents. WTF are you doing?  Then again, my Vespa GT will go at traffic speeds so I don't get run off the road.
Anyone notice that the article repeats itself?  "The animal later recovered and was released into a state national forest.  After watching the dramatic rescue effort unfold, local resident Thad Brett brought his digger to the beachfront to carry the bear away  Back on dry land, local resident Thad Brett had watched the drama unfold and manoeuvred his mechanical digger onto the beach ready to meet the pair.  ''I knew how hard it would be to get that bear out,' said Mr Brett. 'I could see he was about waist-deep in the water.'  The bear recovered and has been relocated to Florida’s Osceola National Forest.'' "
I'm 25 and got a 20.  I smoke a lot of pot too.  The ones I missed were on the last 2 numbers, knowing one but not sure of the other. 
I'm going to print this list out and wipe my ass with it. 
 http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=KZbD92LOIVk
Hey, so is other kinds of racism. And sexism. And every other ism there is.  It's called [John Gabriel's Greater Internet Fuckwad Theory](http://www.penny-arcade.com/comic/2004/03/19/).
It's not working! Try Ctrl+Shift+Z!
Problem:  &gt; We believe that many of these problems are attributable to systems that have not evolved far beyond the computer architectures and programming languages of the 1960’s and 1970’s.  Solution:  &gt; Everyone under him ... is a multi-year vet ... and is going back to their roots and writing code like they probably did in the old days...  What the hell.
Then I did my job.  :-)
The screenshots on the website look old to me, but that might just be me.  On the Ubuntu forums (where Baobab's development and subsequent inclusion in gnome-utils is tracked), [you can see the addition of the ring view in 2007](http://ubuntuforums.org/showpost.php?p=2112923&amp;postcount=48).
I searched my birthday and found the little one who died that day had my last name, and no it isn't Smith.  Creepy huh?
The asterisk is gone. I think they should have kept it if a post was edited _after_ someone replied to it.
What's the name of the kit? A link would be good too. Maybe hot rod the thing with some Ni-Cad or Lith-Ion cells. Add some ultra capacitors for passing Geo Metros. Etch &amp; solder up a controller for regenerative braking &amp; for full fielding the motor when you really need the power. You'ld be the coolest eco-kid on the block!
FBI wouldn't know their arsehole from their earhole.
FOSS naming schemes universally suck, but Ubuntu's is particularly bad.  Disclosure: Am currently running Ubuntu Hairy Hotdog on 2 computers.
Yeah, i see. Crazy. I read your comment but somehow misunderstood it. What did I smoke?
Actually, Amarok does work now. It was Phonon's fault and I fixed it last Saturday: http://www.elpauer.org/index.php?p=258 The fixed Phonon is not installed by the KDEWin32 installer yet, though.
&gt; my town (which geographically is not "the heartland" but socially/politically/economically is very similar)  Suuu-uuure.  Poser.
What's the Christian element got to do with it? Other sites use such filters, seems irrelevant to the story imo.
Depends on how much money you're talking about. I'd invest in some foreign stocks with high dividends. Put some money in precious metal mining companies. Twenty percent in hard money like gold and silver. Silver is relatively cheap right now. But the main idea is to do anything to get out of the dollar.
I give it three weeks, max. 
Yes, but Federal Service isn't just miltary service as suggested at a couple points in the story. Military service just is the followed path in this particular case, probably for the fact it makes a more eloquent arguement about willing to sacrifice for the group. 
I'm 27, and it said I was 27.  Is it good or bad that I seem to be the only one it got right on?
MILK REPOST!
Are you two the same person? You really ought to meet, if not. If only one of you were a woman you might've stood a good chance to finally lose your virginity. Oh my.
Probably a good thing that I never tried, then.  Thank you for the clarification.
haha "Defective Yeti" ... I like the name of this website
i hate telephones.  i concur with this completely.  i got a phone for a month in 98 or 99 but lost it at a company party.  held off til 2006 and got another.  got rid of it after a few months.  my 3rd phone was a blackberry 8830, which i got as an xmas present from the exgf this past new years eve, when it went off ... somehow i had to have a phone.  i'd had a smart phone, and i was addicted.  the blackberry was amazing.  for someone who'd not paid attention to phones for a solid decade, that is.  and what did i replace it with?  something even better.  an htc ppc6800.  with which i am posting this right now, as my cable at the new house isn't on yet... 3 weeks of waiting.  and i haven't missed a damn thing online, i get nearly 2mb/s when i connect to the laptop.  but i still don't do voice calls.  my 99$ unlimited everything plan still clocks less than 50 minutes talk time a month.  i actively lie to people and say i don't have voice service, that i carry it purely as a data device, in fact.  and yes, they are shocked.
wat
We are doomed, doomed I say, when the Iranians are in on the false flag operation. Damn them and their cover stories.
Very, very familiar...
It's too happy.
It depends largely on what sort of calculations you're doing and how well your code is optimized.  When in doubt, benchmark.
C-C-COMBO BREAKER.
great idea!
Actually, it would make more sense in smaller cities which have no transit.  Whaddya doin' DRIVIN in New York?
The constitution defines the type of government, its bodies, the scope and limitations of its power, as well as rights and powers reserved to both the people and the states.  So yeah, it damn well applies to every citizen of the country, whether they're an officer of the government or not.
Python and Ruby are both good choices - there are myriad applications you can use them for and some excellent documentation to learn them.  If you want to get to really understand computers better, I'd actually recommend learning C.  It may seem archaic, but time and time again I come back to it and realize that every time you write C, it's an exercise in better understanding the machine.  On the other extreme, if you want to better understand computer science, learn Lisp or Scheme.  [SICP](http://mitpress.mit.edu/sicp/) is freely available online, and will teach you a whole new way of thinking.  People often think of Lisp or Scheme as very daunting, but Abelson and Sussman do an excellent job of making the subject matter approachable and understandable, and you'll gain far more from it intellectually than if you just fiddle around with toy applications.  (Not that there's anything wrong with that - I started with BASIC myself, and it doesn't get much worse - but I wish I'd known about SICP when I was learning to program.  I have no doubt I'd be better off for it now.)
why isn't Manchester paying him more? Are they cheap bastards or what???? WTF
It said 31 and I just turned 30. I'll presume that's good.
A soft dong is always disappointing. 
Older than the internet...literally
there's nothing wrong with ANY porn?
you'd think so, but this is the government that we're talking about
And reddit.  Can't forget reddit. 
Do you have an actual argument besides sarcasm for the view that the volcanoes affect the ice? Are you an oceanographer?
I didn't.  55%. That's wild.
OTOH, if you leave off the word phone and just say "my mobile" or "my cell", that definitely indicates which side of the pond you're from.
"How a country with VAST natural resources and ALMOST NO people" got wealthier than a nation with roughly equivalent resources and 10x as many people. Interesting  Not.
Break that statistic up by gender and see what you get.  People kill themselves with whatever is available.  Your point is moot, and get over it.  
I prefer the Spanish version: goooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooool.
Like Buffet, Gates is a Democrat. Even though he may have contributed to McCain in the past, he really doesn't need to hide his affiliations anymore (hint no longer in charge of Microsoft).  
I wonder how they thought they could make the horse fly without their readers saying "WTF?"
 Wait, wait, thank you, in addition to not wearing a helmet so you can see, and not wearing a seatbelt so you're thrown clear of an accident, the old "Accelerating out of danger" argument completes the trifecta of serious delusions about motor vehicles. For every accident that's prevented by horsepower ten thousand are caused by horsepower.  That's not an actual figure but be serious folks when the minivan blows through the stoplight right in front of you you're either hit or not before you have a chance to accelerate.
&lt;/self&gt;
Lulu.  Edit: Or Pussy Galore, I fucking dare you.
I work in an O.R. and that is used mostly for urology, I didnt think it was something one could just go out and purchase at a store.
I have a Vespa GT. I love it. Gas mileage is great. It looks cool. Insurance is cheap. Lots of storage. Goes 85mph. Accelerates well. Cvt transmission is cool.
Timeline **so** needs to be on that List...
Fuck that.
And you don't get penalized if people hate it!
_For those who believe, no evidence is necessary... for those who do not none will suffice._  Actually, that's not the case.  If God were, to, say, carve a message to mankind on the moon, or if dinosaur fossils with 'Adam &lt;3 Eve' carved on them were found, or really any conclusive evidence at all, God would cease to be religion, and become science.  Hell, even turning someone into a pillar of salt or parting a sea would be a great start towards restoring His credibility.  As it stands though, zero evidence = zero acceptance among rational observers.   
Dwarves need love, too.
This company will stop at nothing to embarrass itself. Not to mention that i fail to see the logic behind this ad, other then it being propagandistic bullshit. Is flexibility, choice and variety really that bad?
Cryptic sensationalist headlines should always be downvoted.
I completely back peaceful means.  Violence creates a power vacuum, which can be filled by whoever takes advantage.  Right now, I would not condone violence in any degree until violence is first brought upon by the American Government to its people.  The matter now is, is it ethical to attack a government that doesn't attack you, but attacks others (eg. Iran, Iraq, Afghanistan).  I play with the idea of violent uproar, but so long as there are good men of principle like Ron Paul and other Libertarian, I would not give up on America and start shooting people just yet.
The US GOV seems to have gone rogue, who are they working for at all?
I suppose the redundancy is a little...redundant.
&gt;Israel controls US the way a parasite lives off a host. At some point the host has to undergo painful chemotherapy to survive. Or both perish.  Replace "Israel" with Jews (which is what you really mean, since Lieberman is not an Israeli) and "US" with Germany and you've got a *direct* quote from your moral ancestors.
AHHHHH this brought back horrific memories from a disasterous shroom trip I had whereby my arms looked EXACTLY like that image except the bubbles were moving around...
Dammit. That thing came in handy for me at least once when someone tried to change what they said after the fact.
I'm not sure about what I'm supposed to do...
but why bother with failure when there are legions of spineless politicians who loot us at the drop of a couple grand in campaign contributions...
I've never seen a down side to a cell phone.  The convenience is unmatched when I want to use it.  It serves as a replacement for the home phone so cost isn't an issue.  It's not that hard to ignore calls or just turn it off when I don't feel like being bothered. I'm not allowed to have my phone at work so I don't even carry it most of my waking hours.  I'm still trying to figure out a way to take it with me so I can bike to work.
I'm concerned with the number of impoverished veterans.  There are few things worse than poor, desperate, possibly mentally unstable, trained killers.
How sad, the article is about something really interesting. Something the armchair astronomer could get really excited about... and proceeds to not link to or provide addresses for anything the article is actually talking about.  Weird object? No picture..  Site where the public can get involved in astronomy? No link..  *sigh* Horrible article is horrible
The only time I've hit the limit at home has been capturing a movie off TV to a lossless format. DVD ISOs also can be bigger than 4GB. Other than that, it's not a filesize that you reach much as a home user.
Its not like there is anything better to do with English wine 
The biologist saw that trouble was bruin, so he jumped in to lend a hand and bearly saved the animal's life.
I can't get behind any of that.  Get off my lawn.  Damn kids with their beatnik music.  Yeah I guess it was.
Baby, that is fucked up!
Buzzz. Wikkipedia might make more sense, but its actually [wordpress](http://wordpress.com/).
&gt;Virtually everywhere is wired for phone service in the US. If you're in such a remote location that the phone company hasn't established service to the location, then cable and power hasn't either.  But just because you are wired for phone doesn't mean you have good DSL choices.  DSL speeds are not particularly speedy in most places, and even where they are you may find that your house is too far from a node/something-or-other to get the highest speeds.  Sat is a joke for internet.  &gt;What you're really saying is that you don't want to setup an account with the phone company, but that you have the physical lines to your home. You might object to the added $20/month for phone service, but voice that as your objection and not falsely that you live in a forest someplace.  I live in Greenville, SC - a reasonable sized city and our DSL is significantly slower (6mb) than our cable (10mb).  So there isn't an apples to apples option.   &gt;Thats wireless LAN and not an ISP provided WAN service. There are various ways that you can get broadband speed from a wireless ISP provider.  Where do *you* live out of curiosity?
xondar gets it.
Sorry bro, I'm just not feline it.
I hate to say this because I know it's true, but [citation needed]
 Learning the proper way is great advice.  On the other hand the police cars around here have dents all over them and unless the car police get less training than the motorcycle police or something the motorcycle dents have got to hurt more than the car dents.
A naked keyboard. :) I've actually worn off the letters on my iBook G4.  It seriously takes people aback whenever they want to borrow my computer to check email or look something up.  I get a lot of pinched faces and mumbles of "never mind."  :)  Is it bad that I have a bit of high-school typewriting-class snob in me?  Hunt &amp; peckers be damned!  Ms. Latanzi would be so proud.
all the VW tdi's get 44-47, but I guess Deisels don't count??
If you get your education via Reddit, you're in for some very strange education indeed.
You're 23, you can date 16 year olds if you want.
Lisp may have some cool features, but it also has the worst syntax out of any language that I have tried (followed closely by Perl). Whoever developed Lisp must have had an unnatural obsession with parenthesis.  Personally, my productivity is a lot higher in a good language with good syntax than a really great language with terrible syntax.
Um, just because you are told to commit atrocities on behalf of "science" doesn't mean that you should commit such atrocities.  When someone is screaming in pain and pleading for mercy, and you're causing it, you should stop what you're doing immediately (unless it happens to be a consensual BDSM scene), regardless of what any authority, intellectual or not, tells you.
[The mediocrity of 'Garfield' is intentional.](http://www.slate.com/id/2102299/)  Jim Davis is an evil genius.
You're right. Surely they are not doing that many. But I think of those huge bins of stuff they have confiscated from people and I wonder. 
&gt;an ASCII art version of the clock's photo
This is why the terrorists hate us.
That looks like fun!
What point?
direct link http://www.dailymail.co.uk/news/article-528476/Woman-cried-rape-times-spared-jail-perverting-course-justice.html
That's the problem. Money does change people. But once that money is gone....people are horribly afloat in the mimosa of life.   I'd like to have #1,100 in the bank that I never got to touch.  I'd love to be one paycheck ahead of the game. 
http://video.google.com/videoplay?docid=-4116853485060154589&amp;q=obama+aipac+speech+2008&amp;ei=MnlpSJKZDZb0qgOgr9yCCQ  perhaps you havent seen Obama's AIPAC speech.   He is one of them, make no mistake.
I hope they don't get us in hot water.
He speaks that weird language, I think its a rare dialect of "crazy".
This is getting silly.  I've already asserted time and again, based on my personal experience, that they _believe_ that the policies they vote for will reduce the abortion rate.  Why is it so hard for you to accept that they're deceived?  &gt; They're likely programmed by their culture  Agreed.  It's part of the deception  &gt; and the casual acceptance of people like you  Ha!  I argue with these people _way_ more often than I have conversations like this.  &gt; I am confident that if your friends were to embrace such a position, you wouldn't be here making excuse after excuse for them.  You seem to be laboring under the impression that if these people stay the way they are, then I am all okay with that.  Nothing could be further from the truth.  I'm not trying to make excuses for their behavior, I'm trying to get you to understand it outside of your "they're all horrible evil people" paradigm.  Many of them are basically good people, who want to do the right thing, and I think they can be convinced to do so.  Your outlook makes it pretty much hopeless that they'll ever change.  Hell, it pretty much dehumanizes them.  I'm not on board with that.
A police officer detained us for some appropriate questioning but my friend became agitated.
Again, I would contend it was illustrating a militaristic state. Beyond portraying a society that is heavily involved with civil and miltary service, it doesn't really tackle the state of governance as a whole, or general societal views. You are exposed to one small fragment of what is clearly meant to be a much bigger picture. Yes, you can read into it and say its fascism, but thats adding personal feelings where Heinlein left blanks.   But agreed, Heinlein's work is all over the place in terms of opinion and views. I get the impression his work is more to make the reader think, then to convey a specific world view for the reader to buy into. 
Or a suburb, or a trailer park, or... edit: my comment is downmodded for truthiness
The woman in the purple dress' boobs are very distracting. Bouncy, bouncy, bouncy...
I wish they would...they would probably gain some significant insights into how they're damaging their children.
http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=e6jvIvJnBdU  Spanway Hits  From their only full album as Flake Music.
REVOLUTION!!!
I downvoted the article for not playing "I Don't Want to Miss a Thing" as I read it.
Last week in sufflk county NY, a local town police pulled me over in a work truck with the rest of my crew, and had me empty my pockets out while we were talking on the sidewalk. He wasn't even paying attention and didnt want to search inside my cigarette pack or wallet. HE purely did it as a power play. I consented to the search because I didnt feel like getting tickets. If this ever happened to me while on foot, I am definitely going to make the ACLU proud.
Insane in the membrane?
They can be really obnoxious in their attempts to get you to resist them and if you've had a few drinks it may be almost impossible not to get angry.
Much cuter than Tony, fer shurrrr. . .
Agreed. And let's not forget being able to understand, modify, port, re-write legacy mission critical code. And why the hell does reddit not recognize me when I login and then asks me to login again, so it is easier to create a new name and password?
51.  Know how to [Crazy Ivan](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Crazy_Ivan).
People used to talk about the "ugly American." The self-absorbed American that couldn't accept that people in other countries live different lives with different hobbies and interests.  Seems the shoe is firmly on the other foot these days.
Denial occurs a few stages before acceptance. 
Do you tell cattle how ground beef is made?
Downmodded for being shallow and pedantic
Weird, it was up earlier today. Just goes to show you how much Rogers blows. Put up a site to complain about them and they're flooded with traffic!
http://ars.userfriendly.org/cartoons/?id=20020428
 That sounds like my view of the Segway, all of the disadvantages of a bicycle but now of the advantages.  Although to be perfectly honest rolling up to a long steep hill on a hot sweaty day and just twisting your right hand to overcome it has it's appeal. 
...  2018: Subdermally implanted cellular communitrack devices have been mandated by the federal government. My refusal to obtain one has resulted in my subsequent arrest and processing for the crime of progress impedance. The bad news is that I've been sent to an offshore labor colony, tasked with assembling communitrack devices, but the good news is that you can now reach me during televisiting hours, on days when I've exceeded my output quota.
So you buy the house, marry her, and then you live with her in the house. Then she divorces you and gets the house back. Rinse and repeat.  I predict no takers.  She should try: buy my house and I'll fuck you.
Yes, we should all help save the environment by hiring a team of mechanics and vineyard workers to convert our million dollar sports cars to run on wine.
I agree with you, but a fallout-belching rocket that can stay aloft nigh-indefinitely is absolutely mad.
This is actually a pretty good read. Though I find that his definition of Libertarian left is more like the Democrat right. Which would be middle. Where we all should be.
The [Russian](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Solaris) version of *Solaris* was very good, though initially somewhat different from the book.  It's also something like three hours long.  Also, I really enjoyed *Solaris* (the book) and didn't like *Starship Troopers* (the book) so much.  *Solaris* was more about human perspective and love rather than aliens/science.  The book seemed to be more akin to contemporary fiction like Margaret Atwood and Sherman Alexie, where a lot of the details aren't explicitly laid out in an effort to recreate the incomprehensibility of life/love/giant, planet-sized entities.  *Starship Troopers* was more of your standard sci-fi fare, with everything explained and outlined bluntly.  The entire book seemed to only be a vehicle for Heinlein's opinion on basically everything, which is enjoyable if you agree but not so much if you are even the least bit skeptical about the things you read.  The characters in the book were black and white and the only character changes that happened were... contrived and unrealistic (Johnny's father's change of heart; Johnny's own change from naive bro-jock to battle-ready, veteran warrior).  Everybody morphed into pretty much the same sort of self-sacrificing, army-loving person, with the minor variations of "he's a jerk, we hate him" or "he's a great guy, we love him".  Anyway, that's my two cents.  Probably not the most popular two cents you'll ever experience, but eh, thought it might stir up some discussion.
A lot of the Java developers who I respect use intellij and claim its superiority over eclipse. I however have used eclipse for several years and don't really see what intellij brings to the table over eclipse.  If you use intellij what are the must have features missing in eclipse that would keep you from switching (other then key bindings)?
Things will never change as long as "the lesser of two evils" exists, vote for the person you want.  If everyone did that instead of this stupid party line bullshit, picking between the two candidates the global elite want you to pick from, we might actually get a good president. At this point I think it might be better if McCain gets elected, just because it will get so bad that it will probably force major change in the next election...
Make sure you have someone with a camera. Document document DOCUMENT.
Variety is an industry publication, and they accordingly use industry lingo in their articles.
Yeah, I'm trying to figure that out too.
Hasn't the millennium started?
I am 27 and got a 20.  I'm still going to keep drinking beer even though it puts me under the age limit here.  It helps kill off the weak brain cells.
Now, this might just be silly talk, but couldnt the hole have been punched by the pillar of light and energy that used to come out of the supposed quasar?  Its hard to tell from the picture but it looks like it could possibly line up like that.
mm hmm
&gt;Although Oecophylla weaver ants lack a functional sting they can inflict painful bites and often spray formic acid[3][4] directly at the bite wound resulting in intense discomfort.  The spray *acid*? That sounds like the creature in Alien, albeit in a smaller package. Ouch! We have fire ants in Florida, which have a nasty bite too, but at least they don't spray acid.
is this really the decision of an admiral? to make autonomous decisions about what another country can/cannot do
From the article: "Trillions of dollars have been spent to get clean drinking water to people at virtually no cost"  That's nuts! 'at virtually no cost', Every household in America pays monthly for water or for electricity which powers their own well (plus the cost of the well), that's a fantastic amount of money each month.
Back when photography wasn't as prevalent as it is now, it was not uncommon for a family to pose with a deceased loved one for a photograph. Keep in mind back then, that would have been about all that they'd have to remember the deceased by. In the case of babies that die during birth, it's a similar situation. Calling this "wrong", I think, is unbefittingly harsh and judgmental. Though I agree it is creepy.
They thought they were slick, eh, Bill?
I'd put CC1 over PP too, even if it's showing its age.
I can't believe this is being upvoted. Letting the banks go under would be a true disaster for the U.S. economy.
Tell them you're calling the police. That will confuse them!
In this case, it was the people who loved them who disregarded their wishes...  &gt;My grandmother was an atheist, and had two children. My not overtly religious father had 5 children, and his mormon sister had 6 children. Naturally that side of the family eventually outnumbered us. When my grandmother died, my dads mormon sister gave her a FUCKING MORMON FUNERAL! Totaly against her wishes.
That expanding spray foam probably would have done the trick too.
Hopefully, one has not made the sex the night before so one does not get the dreaded, DOUBLE STREAM OF DOOM! Double stream of doom? What is that you ask? [DOUBLESTREAMOFDOOM](http://www.reddit.com/info/6plqy/comments/)
Is that the next version after Python 3000?
no shit sherlock, now explain how using neither company is possible for the vast majority of canadians.  it isn't you ftard!  what they can do is give them less money.  you fail at getting the point.  xondar gets it, read his reply, or just get off the internet.
Weather research has plenty of funding if your conclusions agree with the political consensus.
I forgot who said it but its like Americans get their counter terrorism tactics from movie plots.
Not in California.  Although a good rule of thumb is dividing your age by 2 and adding 7.
He's beaten the US AND UK. We had attacks, too.
I doubt you will get any media attention beyond a blog or two. This kind of shit happens every day.
&gt;That's like saying our high rate of road fatalities is a result of there being driving school.  What?  No.  It would be like saying the high rate of road fatalities is a result of kids not being allowed to drive and then being expected to drive competently after just watching their parents driving for awhile.  Oh wait, that's what we do do.  And oh hey, look at all the wrecks 16 year olds have!  No, I would recommend traffic school that lets them actually drive a car rather than just having their parents tell them what to do or doing it for them.  Like I said, that teaches absolutely nothing.  I'm a little confused as to how you take my position, letting a kid have real experience in a harmless environment, and equate that with being opposed to learning.  What I'm opposed to is NOT learning by just having the parent dictate to them what to do which teaches nothing.  &gt;That's counter to popular consensus. You have some kind of study or research that proves this?  The current credit crisis.  Children are sheltered until they're in college from financial issues by people protesting things like kids having debit cards, high schools going to great lengths to prevent kids from getting jobs, and many other factors designed to infantilize them.  So they go to college, and they end up with a ton of credit card debt.  Because all along the only experience they have is the experience you're arguing is effective - parents controlling everything they do until college.  &gt;This one proves it: you definitely have no experience with children.  And it STILL doesn't matter!  How amazing!  Pick up a book on basic logic to learn why ad hominem attacks destroy anything you say.  &gt;Really? You mean that a 7-year old hasn't the cognitive skills to see how subsequent deposits add up, that interest can accrue, and that delayed gratification can reap huge results?  What?  Yes, they DO.  If you GIVE a child $5 and then FORCE that child to put it in a savings account, the child CANNOT learn from it.  What they did was not save $5.  What they did was get forced to do something by their parents.  It does not register in their brain as saving $5.  It registers as being forced to do something.  They are left believing that if they did anything else, they may have ended up with the same result.  If they were allowed to make the choice themselves, then they would learn the things you say.  When forced by their parents, they learn nothing.  That is my whole point.  &gt;No, but I suspect you might have. You see, I not only saw that it was an effective way to protect myself--I also had no reason not to. Unlike you, I had adult figures around me who helped to guide me through issues like this. I never felt that not wearing a helmet was "bad". I just thought it was stupid not to.  You didn't say your father guided you, you said your father MADE you wear the helmet.  There is a titanic difference.  If your father made you, like you originally said, then no, you didn't learn from it and you're just lying to support your argument (and you have to think, how legitimate is an argument you have to lie to support?).  This is simple psychology.  If a child is forced to do something, the only thing they perceive is being forced.  They don't observe the outcome, they don't contemplate other possible courses of action and what those results might be.  They can't.  They're forced to take only 1 action.  Later, when they are able, they will explore other options because they have no idea what effect such choices might have.  I had plenty of adults around offering guidance, I don't see what that has to do with anything.  Again, read up about "ad hominem", seriously.  You can't have a reasonable discussion if you're just going to attack the speaker.  Not even a simple one.  &gt;Were you potty-trained at gunpoint? Why do you assume every child has to rebel against even sensible lessons they've learned as they grow up? You do realize that there is a middle way, don't you?  No, I wasn't potty-trained at gunpoint and again, my personal experience is irrelevant, as is yours.  Potty training is a sub-intellectual endeavor and i don't think could be discussed in the same vein as what we're talking about - things that children will inevitably learn through experience if they are allowed.  The middle ground is what I have been proposing all along.  The parent offering guidance and advice, but allowing the child to make their own choices and suffer the consequences good or ill.  What you propose is simply forcing them over and over and hoping they gain some insight by osmosis.  I've studied enough psychology to know this NEVER HAPPENS.  &gt;It doesn't make it illegitimate. My point was that your argument deviates so far from practical experience as to suggest you have no practical experience with what you advocate.  Yes, it does make it illegitimate.  Please, before you claim it doesn't again, READ UP about ad hominem.  It's an extremely basic logical fallacy.  Whether I have practical experience or not is wholly irrelevant to whether what I say is true or not.  If a man lived underground for his entire life, and said "The sky is blue" then do you think the skuy cannot be blue because he cannot possibly be right?  No, of course not.  What experience he has is irrelevant.  Whether his claims correspond with reality is the only thing that makes truth or falsehood, and yelling about how he has never been above ground and obviously has never seen a sky is a pointless endeavor that would make your argument that the sky is not blue illegitimate.
Ok...................................................... Definitely today's creepy site of the day.  I believe I will now unplug from the net and take a walk. 
Yeah, but the problem is you didn't want the name "Fuck" for any other reason that to cause a scene.  Would you be offended if your child goes to school and his friend's name was Fuck My Cunt?
&gt;I'm not trying to make excuses for their behavior  Dude, you've done nothing but.   &gt;Many of them are basically good people, who want to do the right thing,   Would you still be saying that if they were calling for life-saving medical treatment to be withheld from black patients if a white patient could not be saved? If they were demanding that a doctor must always triage critical Gentile patients over critical Jewish patients regardless of the degree of danger they were in or the likeliehood of a positive outcome?  You perceive them as good people because you just don't see women's needless deaths as important enough to make a fuss over.  &gt;Why is it so hard for you to accept that they're deceived?  If they are, it's because they've *chosen* to be. If they think reducing abortion is important enough to kill innocent women over, but not important enough for them to look into abortion rates under Bush v. Clinton--that's just more evidence of how little they value women--and babies. 
Especially when it's spelled like that!
I don't even see why I should care about this.
Passed on October 12, 1998 by a unanimous vote in the United States Senate and signed into law by President Bill Clinton on October 28, 1998
Even if I wanted to, I couldn't really think of anything to argue against your stance.
"Some people have a mutation that makes them amazingly resistant to HIV"  It's called being ugly and not getting laid.
My mother's severe asthma cleared up after the last child left home, and my parents also argued a lot less. They love all of us 6 kids, but say there was a lot less tension after we were gone. I'd say that anecdote backs up Daniel Gilbert's theory.
Something happened to him. For the longest time he'd be on all day from his  workplace.
i guess if people feel threatened they try to use whatever they can think of against you.   but i would expect these kinds of problems to come up quite a while after the decision for a male-dominated field. i believe that stereotypes, about how a woman or a man 'should' behave/live, play a role in what careers women and men choose.
I haven't lived in Alabama for almost 40 years, so things are probably a lot different now.  But, back then, yes it was almost entirely about black and white because that was pretty much all there was.  I am sure that now they have a more diverse population like the rest of the country. However, I'll bet that blacks and European whites still constitute an overwhelming percent of the population.  But, I'm not sure what your point was.  Is there some other minority that you are especially interested in?
Exactly, the cops word vs. his.
Link?
Duplicrats and Replicans
We = me, Dave, and the other Dave.
Personally I enjoy the sphincter treadmill featured in the article:  http://www.walyou.com/blog/2008/02/22/decrease-body-weight-and-float-on-a-treadmill/  I've always wanted to kick for my life while being drawn in by a giant butt-hole.
I see two bears there.
Stormfront don't have Conde Nast paying their salaries either.   Reddit's creators aren't to blame, of course, but it's amazing this website is still considered legit after it became basically a mouthpiece for the hateful, conspiracy theorist lunatic fringes of the far Left. 
&gt;So? they can federate, like with ACE Hardware. Just turn the individual franchises into worker co-ops and poof you have economic democracy.  &gt;&gt;Since they're a lot smaller and voluntary, factions don't really emerge,  Federations aren't small.   &gt;Doesn't that seem a little "freedom is slavery" to you?  Objective morality does exist. That doesn't mean you have to be moral. It doesn't mean you have to agree with any particular person's derivation of it or the consequences they see.   &gt;I said that sometimes our rights can be superseded by others and you said that meant I was being inconsistent.  You mentioned that rights can be superseded *before* I said morals are objective. You mentioned imperatives as an agreement to my objection that the outcome -withholding aid- is not in and of itself moral in any sense.   &gt;A problem isn't a cause for failure, it's a possible explanation.  Logically inconsistent people fail by definition, as I've already described.  I wouldn't even bother with it except the hypocrisy does so much damage to the rest of us.  &gt;but what we're debating is whether communism (or some state approximation of it) can be the sole reason a system collapses.  Yeah, and both my points are valid to that discussion.   I've noticed you took my advice and aren't defining communism. Good job. I would only use any definition to disprove itself anyway, which would kind of void the whole debate.  &gt;&gt;Then imagine the CEO has a 51% share and most of the rest are held by the employees. Now it fits your definition but all the problems remain.  &gt;No, it doesn't because 51% isn't remotely commensurate with his stake or the stake held by employees for their stock ownership. But what you're describing is an employee-owned corporation, which I consider progress over strict private ownership of the business.  Then imagine the CEO is 51 people with one share each who happen to all agree with each other. Then it's not just *like* your definition, it *is* your definition.   That's where I was going with it anyway. In each situation, the remaining 49 can get fucked all day long.   I've also noticed you disregarded my points about democracy. &gt;&gt;So you envision a collection of all these tiny co-ops.  &gt;So? they can federate, like with ACE Hardware. Just turn the individual franchises into worker co-ops and poof you have economic democracy.  I...uh...I...that was a question, not an argument?  &gt;A lot of the worker cooperatives even expanded to the point of having to worry about the employee absenteeism at consensus meetings that comes with larger workforces.  Absenteeism is voluntary and therefore not a problem. If they're expanding, under a property rights system, then your objections to property rights are null and void. End corporate welfare and you're more or less done. Wait for time to do the rest. Start/join your own and quit caring what other people do with their time.   And at the very least they don't scale all the way to state size, because otherwise democracy wouldn't suck so much.  For instance, the violent crime rate in England has gone up by 46 times since 1908. Per capita. That's 4600%.   &gt;Capitalist firms don't have an edge on worker co-ops, worker co-ops based on some kind of participatory bond are just less attractive than the prospect of just sucking up the profits.  And if they choose to invest those profits in the business for the purpose of out-competing the co-op, they do and it works. Or, as I said above, your objections to property rights are null and void.  Oh, and [they don't have to be cooperatives](http://www.fastcompany.com/magazine/28/ge.html) to be like Mondragon.   &gt;If they're interested in making money, we have participatory bonds for that  &gt;&gt;worker co-ops based on some kind of participatory bond are just less attractive than the prospect of just sucking up the profits.  I rest my case. 
So was the answer. That's right, a rhetorical *answer*. Why don't you put *that* in your pipe and smoke it?
Something like this happened in new york, I remember the video. Some dude got stopped for some bollocks thing and about 10 people started snapping and then they arrested a load of them.
Hey... same birthday as me...
Me!
deja vu
Is this the new "I don't even own a TV"?
I do think, however, that most people become less selfish when they have kids. There's just so much less time to think about yourself.  
cheeeezy.
It works fine one day out of the year without interaction.
Wow. An entire town full of dumbshits.
Also, police cars are bugged for sound.  Keep your mouth shut.  If they take you to jail on DUI, or maybe something else, you'll typically be put in a room that is being video recorded.  Sit still and don't say shit.
Thanks for the thoughtful reply.  As I mentioned before, I was playfully poking fun at this - not attacking an atheist for wanting things a certain way after death.  I just find it amusing for anyone to care what happens to them after they die.  On the other hand, I admit to caring about what happens to the living that I care about after I die, such as a will and transference of possessions and one could argue that I shouldn't care because I'd be dead.  It is the ultimate power trip I suppose, to hope to be able to control a few things after we are dead for at least a short time.
All you would have to do to know any of those rumors are not true is read a fucking newspaper. Too many American voters can't even do that, and then they wonder why they're paying $4+ for a gallon of gas.
I'll offer to bring the duct tape if someone else can bring the rope.
Fluid intelligence really doesn't have much to do with wisdom or experience.  Granted, if you have two people, one twice as smart as the other, and they accumulate the same amount of experience over the same amount of time, the smarter person may be able to do more with it.  Or, the smarter person may be able to acquire the experience in half the time.  Or, the smarter person may be convinced that they are "special", and end up square-assed, clammy, and full of useless facts, while the idiot has a life.  If people's minds have "hardened", but they have wisdom and experience, should they really bow down to number recall prowess?  Is there some reason they should rely on some skill they no longer possess in spades and feel inferior?  Are you gonna change their shuffleboard scoreboard and defy them to remember who's winning or something?  Maybe they were overvaluing age, maybe you were overvaluing skill at these sorts of tests. 
&gt; More machines cost more money. If you have infinite money then you have infinite scalability, however, nobody does.  actually, no.  The whole point of the "scalability" issue is that if you design wrong, at a certain point there is no amount of money, no technology on the planet that will help you.  You have to design with scalability in mind - and sometimes that actually means designing your feature set as well as how you implement it.
If you have some previous programming knowledge and want to learn C, read the absolute reference: The C programming language (Kernighan &amp; Ritchie)
My experience doesn't match this.  Maybe I live in bizarro world, but our RPG groups have always been balanced or slightly more female, and conventions I've gone to may have fewer females than males, but the ratio isn't even 2 males to one female, let alone 100:1.  Even the universities that are bastions of nerdity (Caltech, MIT) have improved their female-to-male ratios a lot over the last 20 years.  Maybe the extra male geeks are all herding together where I don't see them.
thanks. i guess i should have searched for that myself, i'm just reading the original report: http://www.bls.gov/cps/cpswom2003.pdf  the next question would be: why?? why would anyone hire an inferior candidate because he is male?  i suppose in some work-environments tensions can arise especially in fields with almost no women working there, but that always seemed more like a blue collar problem to me. i personally would be more than happy if there where more talented female mathematicians.  maybe i live in a fantasy world.
Seconded.  Now what?
Without knowing what it is you intend to do, this is the best suggestion I could think of...   Python 2.5.2 (r252:60911, Apr 21 2008, 11:12:42)   Type "help", "copyright", "credits" or "license" for more information.  &gt;&gt;&gt; import random  &gt;&gt;&gt; langs = ('Perl', 'PHP', 'Python', 'Ruby')  &gt;&gt;&gt; print "You're learning %s!" % random.choice(langs)   You're learning Python! 
See what I mean about Vespa owners being snobs? When I got run off the road, it was 2 lanes in each direction, and I was in the right-hand lane.  The road was empty except for myself and the SUV, and a passenger in the SUV leaned out the window and yelled "FAG!" at me as the driver swerved in my direction: forcing me into the hard curb and onto the sidewalk, where my scooter dragged my knee against the pavement.  If you had implied this incident were my fault in my physical presence, and I were in a bad mood at the time, I'd have hit you in the face.  My other accidents were:  * The scooter slid while I was riding across a field (yes, I'm aware that this is reckless), and I bailed into a run and both myself and the scooter were unharmed.  * The scooter slid on wet leaves on top of a wooden bridge/path in the woods, where I again bailed without being injured.  The front fender broke, and I had to pay $30 for another.  * I was doing wheelies and lost balance coming down once, and had to bail (again, no injury) and the right rear quarter panel got scratched.  You've probably never gotten into any accidents because you can't scratch your paint job for fear of losing $1k of aesthetic value on your precious GT.
If they find you passed out drunk by the side of a main road are they allowed to search you?  I am wondering if I have been violated after a night I can barely remember, so to speak.
http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Natural-born_citizen#US_presidential_candidates_born_outside_the_US
I'm 40, but my brain is 28.  Is that good or bad?
 You're making this argument in support of a nuclear powered weapon that's so toxic it doesn't need a warhead?  I'll grant you the "militia" argument but I really, really don't thing that the the founders of the United States saw this coming, I'm sorry.
I bet he never looks at that dog the same way ever again.
I have seen my share of Engrish mashup in my travels.  The theme continues.  
He's the Indiana Jones of biology.
Except stupidity is a human condition. There is really no escaping it where ever you go.
Even though **this would still have been wr0n9**, the fact that nobody was filming should have suggested to him it was a lousy idea.
Vote the index article up if you think Alllie (the poster) is an asshole who posts "vote up if" crap in the index.  (Wow! 1031 votes in agreement. Alllie, I believe that is a record for asshole votes.)
It's sad that Nader, who's done a lot of great things for this country and basically sacrificed his entire life for his beliefs, has become such an out-of-touch blowhard.
reddit.lolcats:  Where memes go to die.
Yes, always go to jail.  And when they put you in the holding room before your test, sit still, act sober, and don't open your mouth.  You are being videotaped.  
I guess the price argument holds:  most people have DVD players already, so why make them pay for another one?
Mormon. You lose!
I suspect you don't get into the country.
upmodded for pisi image!
You could hear about it later, you're not dead when you leave the party.  Dead is dead.  You can't care about anything then.
who cares, I want his oil.
I just could not get past the fact that she has no lower ribcage. She is not human.
While I like this test, I can't use it.  I'm visually impaired and my problems "seeing" it quick enough totally boned me. I'm 31, I got 53 :( 
There's a bunch of youtube music videos to this footage: http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=UQOiGO_4Czg
i have no faith the crtc will do anything about it.  i am always surprised when the crtc does something to benefit canadians.
The version for windows is a bit buggy, but useful. 
There was a great NPR piece about Argentinian inflation sometime in the 80s. It's radio, so it's all about the sound.  The reporter is introducing the story, he goes to a toy store, and there are all these toy sounds as the reporter is talking about the inflation. Then someone turns on one of those monkey drummer toys, the kind that bangs these little cymbals together at about 80 beats per minute, "Ching, ching, ching, ching...".  So that sound fades, and you're listening to the reporter talking about people getting daily raises, and buying bread in the morning because it's twice as expensive as in the afternoon, and all stuff like that. And then at the end of the story they fade the monkey drummer toy back up, and you realize it's been beating relentlessly the whole time, "Ching, ching, ching, ching" through the whole story.  It was a classic piece of radio journalism.
Irony.
UK seems to be have main problems with CCTV and pictures and shit at the moment.
Is it just me or does it look like they're all playing invisible rock band? Especially the guy in the yellow shirt lying on the floor who is clearly shredding an air guitar. 
I knew I didn't read the Garfield comics back in the days because they were funny. I just liked the image of Garfield, and he never offended me with his simplicity. 
"1 out of 217 Americans will be murdered in his or her lifetime." Thats comforting. 
scores range from 20 (best) to 120 (worst)
i totally agree with you there.  there seems to be  a lot of university development in the province these days.  UC for instance has come out with some great research papers recently in the cancer area.
When I just read the title, I thought it meant that we'd be sending nuclear cruise missiles into Pluto. To, like, blow it up, or some shit.  That'd be rather cooler than what the article's really about, I'll say. 
I'll be happy to consult you for an initial fee of $0.
I don't think they pull the "world's longest drive" (golf) record from people just because they get tailwind, do they? Or the record field goal attempt (football)?  I'm just saying that everyone that raced that day had an opportunity to break the world record.  Everyone that races on the next windy day will have another opportunity to break the record.  It's the natural conditions.
I was really hoping there would be some cats, and misspellings, but then [OMG](http://www.bolour.com/papers/images/monad-elevation.png).  They can't even be made simple in diagrams. I give up.
"You better search them, too then..." 
Could be he got free cigars in order to make him perform.
Fucking anti cementics!
shocking.  I only wish I was there at the time so that I could comfort little corey.  And rub cocoa butter all over his hairless body
Yeah, that is a big difference from the US.  If the prosecutor at your trial even mentions the fact they you were silent during your initial arrest and questioning, there is probably going to be a mistrial.  
Utterly shocking.
Except for Ron Paul.  Which is, of course, why Ron Paul never had a chance in this era.  But it's the same thing that makes him *good*.
Voted up with a mouse made of caviar.
Barack me Obamadeus!
Dual Israeli citizenship? How about this, how about you provide some evidence that any of the people in the Bush administration, any of them at all, actually have dual citizenship. People keep making this lying claim and no one backs it up at all. The only supposed support I saw was an "objective" discussion that mention other people who did have dual citizenship, then simply listed people in government who were Jewish or had Jewish sounding names. Do you have anything better than that?  BTW, your "re-phrasing" is still a non-sequitor since the question was why the Democrats haven't striped him of his position.
FISA? Isnt that the thing where the government told the companies to do what they said and they did and Obama doesnt think the companies should have to pay for it?
So how much would collectors pay today for depression era mark notes?
Kucinich was a good candidate, too.
What?! There are sociopathic internet geeks here?  ...  *is flabbergasted*
In the UK, we don't have rights, technically.
For the record, if you're looking for Diablo on the go, the GBA adaptations of Two Towers and Return of the King (but NOT Fellowship) are surprisingly decent.  I picked TTT up from my local game shop on a whim and was pleasantly surprised. It's certainly not as deep or great as Diablo, but it's the best portable Diablo clone I've come across.  (which makes it doubly surprising considering it's a licensed movie tie-in)
 &gt;That doesn't, of course, make nuking cities "right," but it does fill a genuine military/strategic need.  Only if you consider MAD (Mutually Assured Destruction) a military/strategic need. I think that's (now that we're *hopefully* past that) insanity.  And I think that the collective "we" still have enough extra nukes to destroy civilization.
I propose this: if aliens ever received our television signals, they would naturally stay away. 
I'm afraid you are confusing ratting someone out with setting them up.  Ratting them out involves telling what you know about some person's activities, whereabouts and "known associates" whereas setting them up would require the target to trust someone who has a drug charge hanging over his head.  And, since it involves meth, coke and weed, his life and health could be in jeopardy.
ugh, The sad thing Is I spent a large portion of my life in this town, and this is in no way an exageration
It means it was once amputated and replaced.
So how much do you think they'll give you for dumping Israel?
It's better than my calendar which had a built in clock. You had to change the time every second.  Every. Second. Push a button. I can't tell you how many times I was early to work because I drank too many cups of coffee that morning.
Elaborate, please.  I really haven't heard of too many high-profile anti-science liberals lately.
the second submission was about IV1ax calling some fucker a douchebag so I thought I'd return the favor because I'm high and a little heavy.
Holy hell. If you write code that looks like that you fucking well _deserve_ to get screwed over by the compiler.
werd. the 90s made me stop collecting comics. the girls too but mostly the 90s.
Eh, there's as much far right as there is far left.
They do care about what American people think, insofar as it affects their chances of getting elected and retaining power.
No. In fact, my new tactic is to click on the poster's name, and then I go in and whack off 5 karma points from their previous posts to make 'em pay that way. Fucking idiots.
The only legitimate use of air quotes. American "capitalism".
why on earth are you pseudoLeftists and your opposite dronebots, the fundie rightwingers, both so rabidly obsessed with gays and queers and gay sex and race and blacks and mexicans etc etc etc etcetc?????  Maybe it is because your overlords, the rich and powerful, have programmed you all with propaganda that makes you think this shit is so important?  whatever happened to **trueleftists** that were concerned primarily with taxing the rich and providing universal healthcare, with more time for annual vacation, higher minimum wage, lowering immigration that floods the labor market, etc. Real populist economic issues like those!  Instead you pavlovian meatbots are programmed by the rich to obsess and attack over gay sex and race and gender....
Congress cares when you vote for them and that's pretty much it. 
Perhaps you should buy a bridge.  I can hook you up...
"you pee telephony, I pee urine..." LMAO
No.  Obama is like Pelosi(and McCain, and Hillary, and Lieberman, and..), AIPAC/CFR whores.  The defining issues are fiscal, the Constitution, and warmongering. All the promises Obama gives hinge on the fiscal, continuing to live the American way of life rest on the Constitution, and the warmongering will unravel the US both ways. Obama is going to continue the destruction of the US economy as his plan merely shuffles the same tax base around(a robin hood plan, good for garnering votes, pit classes, divide and conquer) while adding to the deficit(how he plans to cover the bulk of his policies and handouts,) and leaves the root problem untouched, the federal reserve, which gets interest for every dollar generated, which makes it impossible to get out of debt, continue the warmongering as shown by his voting three times to fund the occupation, will keep occupying Iraq, keep the attack of Iran on schedule, threat of doing the same for Pakistan, which follows the neocon plan, which includes toppling other nations as well, the purpose of which is for the benefit of Israel, which he promises his unwavering commitment to continue voting 100% in their interests, and dismantle the Constitution from things like voting to make the patriot act permanent, ushering in the NAU, continue the fake "war on terror", expect him to vote for the homegrown terrorism act, which pretty much finishes off the Constitution in one hit.  Obama's letter to AIPAC: http://www.jewishexponent.com/article/15799/ http://www.wakeupfromyourslumber.com/node/1349  Obama's adviser: http://wharrison55.newsvine.com/_news/2008/04/04/1410752-obama-adviser-60000-to-80000-us-troops-in-iraq-through-2010  Obama's speech about attacking Iran: http://antiwarleague.net/blog/index.php?itemid=66  Obama's essay published by the Dallas Morning News supporting the NAU: http://noworldsystem.com/2008/02/23/obama-supports-north-american-union-agenda/  Obama admits his opposition to NAFTA was fake: http://money.cnn.com/2008/06/18/magazines/fortune/easton_obama.fortune/?postversion=2008061810 http://lonewacko.com/blog/archives/007756.html  The NTUF's cost estimates analyses of the presidential candidate's proposals: http://www.ntu.org/main/press.php?PressID=991&amp;org_name=NTUF  Obama's tax policy, like McCain's, covered by increasing the deficit: http://money.cnn.com/2008/06/11/news/economy/candidates_taxproposals_tpc/?postversion=208061113  Initially said he supported the homegrown terrorism act, then says he's undecided, and that he'll consider it. Ignoring that he first said he was for it, how can he say he's undecided, let alone consider it while claiming to be for the Constitution? s.1959 has long been available, the house version h.r.1955 even longer still. It's simple, he can't, and he's not.  http://www.indypendent.org/2007/12/10/obama-supports-homegrown-terrorism-bill/ http://youtube.com/watch?v=9wJsovPRTEM&amp;feature=PlayList&amp;p=11BA5C936B9D32EB&amp;index=41
Holy shit. I patternmatched that Osama in the context Osama has won, to be Obama.  LOL WE CAN DO IT. OBAMA IS WINNER SUBLIMINAL MESSAGE HAS INFESTED MY SUBCONCIOUS.
so fix it.  youve got the source code.
Epic text wall spanning multiple years and seemingly random thoughts. +2 internets to you.
"Let's be fair: those on the political left have undoubtedly abused science in the past.  While the best environmental groups marshal good science to make their case, more radical groups have occasionally allowed ideology to usurp fact.  ...  So give conservatives a few points, here and there, on the question of left wing science politicization.  It cerntainly exists.... In fact, in politicized fights involving science, it is rare to find liberals entirely innocent of abuses.  But they are almost never as guilty as the Right." -- Chris Mooney, [*The Republican War On Science*](http://www.waronscience.com/home.php)
last night, here in Australia, there was a documentary about the mishandled funds spent by the military to private contractors. The military officials spent with glee since it was on 'cost +', which seemed to mean you had a blank cheque to spend what you wanted.
Sorry Will, but if it smells like Scientology, looks like Scientology and acts like Scientology, it's probably Scientology.
Whether this view is kept generally depends on which side shoots you first :)
Me thinks I need some [new carrots](http://www.reddit.com/info/6po0u/comments/c04jbn2) to properly test the reddit population.
Yes. Many of these people DID in fact fail government class.   This is America.   The stupid kid who ate paste in the back of the room gets to vote too.
Ooh! Ooh! I get to.... *whoosh* It's an open source *Windows*. That's the big deal.
Um...  Do we get pissy at Europeans for not caring about baseball?
I won't speak for Scheme, Lisp, or Tcl, because I don't know them, but Smalltalk has this ability as well, and the way Smalltalk ends up being written is that existing control structures and objects are reused quite a bit, which prevents a lot of this sort of degeneration. Being able to dynamically modify them, combined with a strong culture of unit testing, helps a lot here. Since I don't really see perl written this way I can't really compare.  Additionally, because the language syntax is very simple, Smalltalk is quite easy for a person to parse and figure out what's going on. Perl, on the other hand, has an incredibly complicated syntax that pretty much guarantees that any large codebase written by a lot of people will diverge substantially.   My own personal last straw with perl was when I was going through the Bioperl library, realizing that there was absolutely no consistency when even doing fairly simple things across different modules. I didn't have time to plumb through the camel book to keep learning new arcane bits of the syntax just to fix a bug, I wanted to fix the bug. Perl's complex syntax got in the way of me getting work done. Granted, bioperl is a pretty notoriously hideous pile of code, but the nature of perl did absolutely nothing to prevent this. In experienced hands perl is fine, but in the real world where people have to contend with each other's code perl ends up causing real pain and annoyances. I don't know if python or whatever is better, but the problems surrounding perl's design are real.
I can't wait to hear more about Battle.NET
I bet you'd enjoy reading THE book on nuclear strategy, [Strategy in the Missile Age](http://www.rand.org/pubs/commercial_books/CB137-1/) which is available for free in PDF.  The first part is a very interesting review of strategic bombing in WW2, and the second part covers the various rationales behind MAD/first strike/etc..
Too bad Python was antisemitic.  Don't believe me? Ask [John Cleese](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=9sC9wc6m4PU&amp;feature=relate).
i can just imagine japanese teenagers showing each other their old guy pictures at lunch.
as mentioned above, circumcised (baldies) also suffer the situation. It is NOT the foreskin that gets in the way, but some of the ejaculate that dries up in the tip of the urethra because of the exposure to air. Even with thorough cleaning, there may be further minor discharges or oozing that still can cause this. 
I wonder if it was worth it to tear that community apart.  Also, the crackdown no doubt led to a decline in the number of crimes reported due to fear of deportation.
Yeah, there's a case in Austin in which it is common knowledge that the son of a well connected person was actually convicted of vehicular homicide while drunk and received deferred adjudication from the friends of his father. Now, when it is spoken of, it can't be spoken of, because the record has been expunged.  Hmmm, reminds me of the bedmate of someone who lives in the White House.
One good thing about AOL is that it has a "Mark as Unread" button.
I reddit. And yes it is interesting.
Turing thesis is thesis because it cannot be formally defined. I quess the biggest secred of computer science is the fact that definition of computation is circular definition.  
Hey that could be a new game. Spin the spinner, move your piece on the board, draw a card and explain why what the card says the president is doing is OK. You could have your pick of different characters in the administration.   No you can't all be Cheney (Whaq whaq).
Wait, I know this one!  Well, I certainly applaud anyone wanting to do a hundred posts before the lock, but take it from this old gym rat, I've spent my entire adult life in front of the computer, and a program like this one can do more harm than good.  If you only train one part of your body (and that's all a single exercise like 100 posts before the lock is going to do for you), you're setting yourself up for carpal tunnel injuries down the road. I've seen it a hundred times.  It's like putting a powerful engine in a stock Toyota Tercel. What will you accomplish? You'll blow out the drive train, the clutch, the transmission, etc., because those factory parts aren't designed to handle the power of an engine much more powerful than the factory installed engine.  100 posts before the lock basically only train the finger muscles and to some extent, the triceps. What you really want to do is train your entire body, all the major muscle groups (chest, back, abdomen, legs, shoulders and arms) at the same time, over the course of a workout. And don't forget your cardiovascular work!  I'm proud of you guys wanting to do this. Three cheers! Falling in love with social networks and comment forums, posting right, etc., is one of the greatest things you can do for yourself. And you WILL fall in love with it if you can just force yourself to stick with it a year or two and experience the amazing progress you'll make.  But do it right, okay?  My advice, find a good submission, with seasoned commenters who will write your posts for you (especially in the beginning, until you get the hang of it yourself) and guide you in your quest for witty repartee. Thirty to 45 minutes a day, three days a week, is all you'll ever need to do (I refuse to believe anyone is so busy that he or she cannot make time for that, especially considering how important it is).  And don't worry about being embarrassed or not being in shape the first time you post before the lock. You have to start somewhere and almost every one of us were there ourselves at one time. So no one will say anything to you and very, very quickly you will progress way beyond that stage anyway.  Now get out there and do it! :-)
It's a sad.. scrap that.. it's a usual day when a Reddit user goes on about some mythical superiority over Digg.
Let's count the win in this picture:  1. Fly down, check. 2. Dorky glasses, check. 3. Bowl haircut, check. 4. Dog collar, check. 5. Fat, check. 6. Acne, check. 7. Dressed all in black, check. 8. Action figures still in their boxes, check.  I could probably go on all day, there's just too much there.
actually, I have a pal of mine that was at ground zero when the first anthrax letters were delivered in Florida.  He never got sick from the anthrax, but the regimen of medications they gave him nearly killed him. 
Wasn't that in a movie?
Is there only one video? It looks like it's part of a series, especially as other cast members are listed, but I see no others. Perhaps it's the first of a series.
&gt; "Thanks to the pamphlet, we do not have to struggle to come up with the English translations of dishes any more, which is usually time consuming," a senior manager at the four-star Guangzhou Hotel in downtown Beijing told the Xinhua news agency.  Why don't these people just hire someone who speaks English?
Don't take it bar hopping. Don't drive it with so much as a drop of alcohol in your system, ever, under any circumstances.  /Don't ride, plenty of family members do, will be learning shortly.
How was I supposed to know the models of that shitty make.
"While Iran claimed the blast was caused by a gas leak, Western military sources are skeptical and believe the authorities are trying to cover up some sort of sabotage."  ...damn conspiracy theorists...
wtf is wrong with this guy?
**BURN IT WITH FIRE**
...then the kid died :(
if you know what I mean tell it yourself. You've obviously never taken part in a debating society.  My morals are just fine, thank you.
&gt; All I am saying in Dawkins has a very condescending tone throughout the entire thing. It's well written to be sure, but there's no argument there at all.  You then went on to say that you would call the person names, but omit any explanation.  Don't you think it's a bit hypocritical to accuse Dawkins of doing that?  &gt; He's pointing out this guy's insanity because his education should warrant him a different understanding. No shit.  The point Dawkins is making is not that this guy should know better, but that there is no evidence that could possibly convince him because he readily admits he chooses faith over facts.  It's not a case of Dawkins saying "look how stupid this guy is", but rather a case of Dawkins pointing out that some people are religious through informed choice and not mere ignorance.  Dawkins thinks that's pathetic all right, but it's certainly not the drive-by name-calling you make it out to be.
fucking asstards
One-Zip
When it comes to Jews &amp; Israel, far right and far left are pretty much the same. The term ZOG, for example, was create by a neo-Nazi American - and yet what it stands for is echoed in many so-called leftist Redditors' posts:  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Zionist_Occupation_Government
really, this is testing short term memory.  At no point should it be flattering to score higher than your age (if this is really all it claims to be, although I doubt any real study was done to figure out what ages should be showing up with specific scores.)  My guess is that there is a minimum age it will go to, probably somewhere around 20.  I ran through this 3 times, the first time I got 31, the second I got 25, the third I got 23.  I don't know what my score was the first time, but the second time I got 6 right, 4 wrong, the third I got 7 right, 3 wrong.  and I just ran it again, got 7 right 3 wrong and got an age of 20 (I'm actually 26.)
It certainly was not the first case of someone realizing code and data are the same thing. See Goedel numbering and the universal turing machine that treats other machines' descriptions as data.  Btw, lisp is truly worth learning, but how in the world could *it* be the *most important* idea in computer science? This is crazy.
Nah. I just click on your name, and then go downvote other articles you have posted. That way you DO pay karmically for annoying the shit out of everyone.
ok?  :)
&gt; Because yes, "Site:Wikipedia neurogenesis human 4-5 weeks was clearly a search anyone would have tried.  Ummm... well I told you "Wikipedia" so you knew where to look... and I said "Neurogenesis" not "Embryogenesis" so I'm not sure where you're pulling the latter from, except your ass.  "Human" and "4-5 weeks" seemed like a natural fit from my earlier comment... would you have tried to search on "Mallard" or "6 months"?  Fuck, those keywords were exactly what I typed into Google first fucking try and I got the page hit you were asking for. So like... sorry if you're too stupid to know how to use Google.  Dipshit like you is so stupid that if I told you go next door, you'd walk all around the earth and then bitch than I didn't tell you to start in the other direction.  Don't go bitching to me because you're a fucking retard.   Your momma and poppa did a good enough job causing that.
From this episode: http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/The_Family_of_Blood  In case anyone is confusing this with something from the last episode  [This](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=dY1buFeWREs&amp;NR=1) remix made me chuckle, as did [this one](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Uz9JKbSkUW8&amp;feature=related). And [this one](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=OjSasrDBsUQ&amp;NR=1).
Excuse me?
Nice.  So she snapped out of her "trance" because of a spider?  Fucking idiots.
Several obvious reasons:  1. He votes with Democrats more than 85% of the time.  2. He provides the Democrats with a crucial extra vote, and in the event of a 50-49 split of the Senate, would provide the tiebreaking vote giving the leadership of the Senate to Democrats.
Is it really that easy to just "convert" your money to Euros? ie - can you just walk in to the bank and say, hey, I want my XYZ account to be in Euros?
How is this better than zoho wiki? http://wiki.zoho.com
Are we having fun yet?
These people have been eating plants that are infested with viral particles for years...not really any different from what it would be with the GM.  Actually, you probably eat plants infested with viral DNA and RNA all the time. Viruses are a real problem in agriculture, especially in greenhouses.  Anyway...I guess my original point was, when it comes down to famine and people starving versus the *questionable* risks of GM crops, I'm sure they would rather eat.
Michael Hudson: The reason U.S. labor has lost its competitiveness is not simply a race to the bottom. To see why U.S. exports are being priced out of world markets, you need to look not only at the take-home pay of workers, but also at what employers are not investing to raise capital productivity, and what they don't get from government in the form of basic infrastructure support.    One reason why employers have not invested as much in raising the productivity of their plant and equipment is that they are saddled with having to pay out more of their cash flow as interest to bondholders and banks, and dividends to assuage shareholder activists, the new euphemism for financial raiders.    U.S. corporate philosophy has been more driven by knee-jerk ideology than by enlightened self-interest. General Motors has pointed out that it has to pay enormous health care costs that its foreign competitors don't. Some sixty years belatedly it's finally discovered that socialized medicine is more efficient that health care privatized by predatory financial and insurance operators. Government services don't build in interest rate costs, dividends, exorbitant management remuneration, stock options and legal fees. All this absorbs a big part of the corporate expense for its work force ­ without raising labor's living standards in the process.    Meanwhile, educating doctors, dentists and nurses is much less costly abroad. Here, they emerge from medical school with hundreds of thousands of dollars in debt, and then have to take on more debt to set up their offices, then they need to buy expensive liability insurance. Once they get on an HMO schedule, they usually have to wait for a year or so to actually get paid. Meanwhile, they have to hire their own full-time bookkeepers just to deal with the HMOs. Doctors, dentists and nurses are being put on rations.    Most of all, the price of labor reflects the high cost of housing here ­mainly the cost of carrying a home mortgage ­ plus non-mortgage debt. Labor doesn't benefit from these costs. And as matters have turned out, industry hasn't benefited either. It's the price the U.S. economy as a whole is paying for having become financialized and privatized in a dysfunctional way. The tax system favors speculative gains and absentee ownership. Ironic as it may sound, really wealthy people prefer not to make any income at all. They prefer to focus on total returns, which they take in the form of capital gains. This is why hedge fund billionaires pay a much lower tax than their secretaries. Real estate is still our largest sector ­most of its market price consisting of the land's site value ­ rather than industry and other means of production. Given the existing loopholes, I would prefer not to tax corporate profits or even income at all, if the government could tax the free lunch of economic rent at its source. The discussion of WHAT to tax therefore should take precedence over how highly to tax the scant income that wealthy people are obliged to declare from the FIRE sector ­ finance, insurance and real estate.
Well, time to get down modded into oblivion.  Speaking from some level of experience (father used to be a judge) I have to say that I am appalled at the reactions on both sides of this story. First you have the court system which obviously favors those who have leverage and know how to work it (when doesn't it?) and a media blackout.  Then there is you the redditors who, excuse me if I am boiling this down wrong but, want to rake this kid over the coals.....for a drug crime.  I'm all for justice but isn't making an example out of a kid just because of who his dad is seem kind of...wrong?  I don't know the kid, or his dad, but I know a tad about what its like to have your entire family roasted over a gigantic public fire and it fucking sucks.  It sucks even more knowing that just because of who you're family is any toe you step out of line will have an immediate spotlight cast on it.  The kid fucked up and the dad is acting like any dad would act in this situation, is it right? prolly not, but should this be headline news for the next year just because of the dads day job?  
Super Glue
Cupertino, CA
[Dr. Liam Neesam?](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=1Ro5wXIr25E&amp;feature=related)
&gt;its passion, it's genius, and for its ability  Most people choose to do it wrong or right all the time.  Other than that, I have to say I mostly agree with you. The background music and how it goes with the words are sometimes nice in mainstream hip-hop, and I haven't heard of this "underground intelligent hip-hop" before. Rest assured I will look into it.
I know some British guys who are really big Yankees fans. Go Yankees!!
And if everyone rode?
Eewww... I guess that's what I wanted to know, but at the same time, I really didn't want to know.  This thread creeps me out, and it's my own fault for joining in.
The two largest political parties in Canada:  http://www.liberal.ca/   http://www.conservative.ca/  
But there's nothing preventing them from adding finer grained APIs. Under linux, one can easily deny all access to the network except for a userspace daemon that verified a process's permission to connect to certain hosts. Certainly vx32 is neat, it's just not enabling anything that couldn't be achieved by working with the operating system.
irrelevant; they will nuke you from a satellite at any moment.
My favorite support story from hell is the time when I was woken out of bed at 4:00 am (living in New York at the time) from a user in London complaining that she couldn't log in.  It turned out she had her caps lock key turned on.
Dude, what the hell do you have against okra?  If I was in DC I'd be all over this offer.  All cleaned and ready to go, no slimy stuff, just fry it up and eat.  Delicious.
just read the domain name
[It's raining bears?](http://www.blackpoolgrand.co.uk/media/0735_bearlesque%202.jpg)
I intentionally submitted wrong answers for every sequence of 4 or greater, and it guessed my age as 57 years young.  Apparently, a 57-year-old's short term memory capacity isn't enough to recall more than 3 numbers at once.  Man, I do not want to get that old.  
Yes, yes this is true...
looks like theyre down at the moment (5:45 PM on the left coast)
&gt;You've obviously never taken part in a debating society.  Dear me, you've got me there. The shame!  I don't need to say what you mean, you said it pretty clearly yourself. I'm just pointing out you'd be in full agreement with classic European racists circa early 20th century.
So why those most brilliant, able, well-educated folks on the planet can't it take their fingers out of my pocket?
I screwed up whenever there was a zero. For some reason my brain kept mentally substituting 10 for 0.  Edit: "Mentally"? Duh. What else would it do?
&gt;I just think he could have done it better  Blasphemy! :)  I have so much reverence for the comic that I can't really have a rational discussion about it. To me, V's moral ambiguity is an essential part of making the story more than a typical adolescent revenge fantasy, and by suggesting the ambiguity doesn't exist or is somehow weak, it's like you're strangling my pet hamster or something.  So let's agree to disagree. :)
wow, I'm the same age and I got the same score. That must mean you are as good looking as me.
It was practically a dead heat, twice.  That's plenty bad enough.
ate beets tonight. they were in potato salad.   in fact, i eat beets about once a week. love them.
Don't know if LBJ was necessarily great, but he did sign the Civil Rights Act of 1964.
Yes, but who wants to emulate a clunky interface with bloated APIs?  Let's move to the future, not the past.
The cool part would be if we never actually detonated it, but just had it swoop down over people going about their business every once in a while, just to fuck with them (ignoring the deadly ambient radiation).
In this case, the most I could see the child being punished with justly is, (if it is the case) using learning time for personal or non-educational objectives. Would the playground be a less injurious location for handing out invitations?  Either way, the two children excluded would surely find out, especially if one is a friend with whom the student had a falling out. More to the point, it seems that what is essentially more damaging to a child's self-esteem is attempting to shield him or her from minor deflationary moments which otherwise could condition a child to the inevitable moments of disappointment or social rejection which faces everyone in some form at some point in life.
The problem is we managed to stop all this nonsense by downvoting these damn things. Then when they said "karma doesn't count", the vote up ifs came back because they don't get the negative karma anymore. Fuggin' bastages.
Jon Dough?
&gt;He knows that the flip side to building almost any mass-market culture-industry icon—think Mickey Mouse or McDonald's—is intense loathing by the minority who will despise it.  Huh? I can buy that he designed Garfield this way to be successful, but he sure didn't avoid this problem. I can't think of any popular character as loathed as Garfield, and it's precisely because of his utter banality.
I wasn't thinking about that. Once every seven years or so then.  All it needed was a bump gear that engaged the other three flips every other 12 hour cycle.
Do you have a public library, a college with free wi-fi, or any kind of public area with free internet?   The first time I see a message like this, I will cancel my service regardless of the availability of other options.   Please let me know if your situation makes home internet a NEED rather than a WANT. This from someone who works from home 2x/week.
I got the +7 -3 =20 score, but it didn't seem to be scoring how far through an eight-number sequence you made it before you missed one.  Wrong was wrong.  It could probably be improved in that way.  (I'm 37, *don't tell anybody*).  EDIT:  Nevermind, I did get a different score for +7 -3 when I did it again, it gave me a 25, and I missed an earlier number in the sequence.  
  The most decorated living military man, Air Force Colonel Bud Day, coincidentally, was also being held as a prisoner of war in Hanoi at the same place as John McCain.   He is often cited as being the most decorated U.S. service member since General Douglas MacArthur, having received some seventy decorations, a majority for actions in combat. Day is a recipient of the Medal of Honor.   Colonel Day had some very succinct remarks about John Kerry. He also has quite a bit to say about John McCain.    To find out what Colonel Day knows about this situation, (remember, he actually met John McCain while they were both prisoners of war)Find his (Bud Day's) views here. You may be surprised.  http://www.historynet.com/bud-day-vietnam-war-pow-hero.htm/5   This story tells a lot about the guys like  Bud Day and John McCain. Read what Bud Day has to say about McCain.    Also, here is a little bit that I found in wikipedia, it quotes the citation for the Medal of Honor.: quoting: "Citation: On 26 August 1967, Col. Day was forced to eject from his aircraft over North Vietnam when it was hit by ground fire. His right arm was broken in 3 places, and his left knee was badly sprained. He was immediately captured by hostile forces and taken to a prison camp where he was interrogated and severely tortured. After causing the guards to relax their vigilance, Col. Day escaped into the jungle and began the trek toward South Vietnam. Despite injuries inflicted by fragments of a bomb or rocket, he continued southward surviving only on a few berries and uncooked frogs. He successfully evaded enemy patrols and reached the Ben Hai River, where he encountered U.S. artillery barrages. With the aid of a bamboo log float, Col. Day swam across the river and entered the demilitarized zone. Due to delirium, he lost his sense of direction and wandered aimlessly for several days. After several unsuccessful attempts to signal U.S. aircraft, he was ambushed and recaptured by the Viet Cong, sustaining gunshot wounds to his left hand and thigh. He was returned to the prison from which he had escaped and later was moved to Hanoi after giving his captors false information to questions put before him. Physically, Col. Day was totally debilitated and unable to perform even the simplest task for himself. Despite his many injuries, he continued to offer maximum resistance. His personal bravery in the face of deadly enemy pressure was significant in saving the lives of fellow aviators who were still flying against the enemy. Col. Day's conspicuous gallantry and intrepidity at the risk of his life above and beyond the call of duty are in keeping with the highest traditions of the U.S. Air Force and reflect great credit upon himself and the U.S. Armed Forces.    But to get a first hand account of McCain's actions while he was a prisoner of war, take the time to read Bud Day's account of what exactly he thought of John McCain. You will be amazed. http://www.historynet.com/bud-day-vietnam-war-pow-hero.htm/5    I lifted this quote from the story "...... that..[Col].. Day should sue McCain for medical malpractice, because the technique was unsanitary and amateurish." The quote is out of context of course, but take the time to read it.. Amazing anecdotes =- McCain doesn't like to talk about this stuff, so you won't hear it from him. I wonder why McCain doesn't like to say much about this stuff.  Often times you will find that the real heroes have a sort of clam up reflex about these things, and no amount of prodding can get them to really open up.  This is how an astute judge of character can profile these things.    
&gt; This was tried and failed. By and large, it existed as a mechanism to keep black people from voting, and an effective one at that.  Well to be fair, most of those black people who were prevented from voting probably *were not* actually in a position to make informed political decisions.
Irony trumps everything.
you think that you think that you care but don't really think.
That's right.
You know who else burned things in stoves....
I'm 19 and it said I was 20.
What large monitors giveth, mobile devices taketh away ...
Correct.  However, now you're changing someone else's timeline, not your own.  If you want to go back and experience the enjoyment of killing Hitler, you can, but you wouldn't be saving millions of lives because your actions would have no effect on the timeline you call home.
i was thinking an antique diving helmet with turtleneck attachment
I really don't see why the world needs a DVD-capable Wii.  It would just add cost and, seriously, who would ever use it as their primary player? Although I am amused at the thought of them developing gesture-based remote controls.  Flick forward for chapter skip, double-flip for FF, etc.  But that would almost certainly be a REALLY bad idea.
Umm... there's no Medics in SC2 from everything I've read on it.  http://www.gamoholic.net/images/stories/Starcraft_2_iunie/Starcraft2_20.jpg  Some of these are screens look like they're from a mod remake that has been coming out on the WC3 engine for like 3 years now.
SHUT THE FUCK UP! I'll kick your ass.
if you don't like comments, then why not google news?
Python is the way to go!
No they don't because unless you're able to see into the future, natural keys can't survive *future* changes to business rules. The first one is much easier to maintain because it'll *always* work and no biz rule change made later will break it.  The latter one will break as soon as someone decides usernames are just nicknames and they shouldn't require them to be unique, or even require them at all.  This kind of shit happens time and time again in real applications.
And while stupid people will imagine only one possible scenario in their tiny little minds and laugh like an imbecile at what they think is what is happening, others like myself will immediately think 4 or 5 or more plausible situations, some of which make more sense and are therefore not funny.  It's hard to go through life not being able to laugh at pictures like that, but I get to laugh at the idiots who do.  So it evens out in the end.
I'm 26 and I also got a 20! Definitely think it's the beer that does it.
i guess it comes down to how much koolaid you drank (or had forced down your throat) before you get to the deciding point. i was a church-going catholic and went to catholic school K-12 and still decided after all that that the sciences offered a better explanation of things than the bible. the hardest thing for me was telling my very conservative parents, but it was pretty easy for me to determine for myself which to believe.   it goes to show that religion is still a very powerful force as silly as many of us view it.
I run a dark theme (customized ubuntu studio theme - darker, no blue) and it works fine for me on 8.04. It is kind of hard to see text in a text box on some websites, but not bad enough to not use it. 
I lost a mark in a CS exam because of a question about this!
Sigh.
Two construction workers are discussing what they would do if atomic war broke out and they only had 20 minutes to live. The first one says, "I would fuck some hot chick, how about you?" The second one replies, "I would stand perfectly still."
In that case, I am in perfect agreement with you. Cheers!
Williamsburg !&gt; Manhattan.  Manhattan (especially Union Square where I live) is much better.  However here my only option is Time Warner but in my last building (1 University Place by Washington Square) I had the option of RCN or Time Warner and RCN was significantly faster, less capped, and cheaper.  Shame.
&gt;s/he's/you're  I think you either replied to the wrong person, or you don't understand perl regex replace syntax.
The last minute has not yet arrived. We have no idea how completely things will be fucked up before 1/20/09.
Are you dense or just joking.  Why wouldnt Jim be back.  He is the main character.  I seriously hope you are joking.  If jim doesnt come back Ill just die.
I didn't think about the coffee, but I guess that beats a broken cellphone.
While I know that the book didn't really go into the economic system, everything about the political system that we *did* see pointed to the supremacy of the state with everything being done in the service thereof, and that the individual and individual rights didn't matter. That's the defining feature of fascism offered by Mussolini.
It means you're probably too old to be thinking about pizza and beer as much as you are...
Ohh! Sweet, I've already got that!
badass for sure. Loved royale.  The music tho. I think I heard it somewhere before. Enough with the children's chorus singing latin or whatever the fuck it is. It's SO last week.  Give us some boards of canada or something. 
I've taken part in infant and fetuses autopsies. I cried those nights so hard.
&gt;CVE-ID: CVE-2008-2314  &gt;Impact: A person with physical access may be able to bypass the screen lock  W...T...F...  As though the root escalation with AppleScript and ARDagent weren't bad enough.  I think the only reason I didn't discover this on my own was that I don't use screen corners.
This has got to be the funniest thing I've seen all year.
Yes, he was.
Yeah, I caught that too.
&gt; The strategy is much akin to cutting your hair before a wrestling match: It gives your opponent one less thing to grab onto.   All this talk about haircuts, wrestling and grabbing seems somehow appropriate.
I'm an underachiever. It's what I do.
*Some* hypermiling techniques are dangerous, but not all of them are. I use some of the more sensible techniques, such as gentle acceleration from stops, coasting when it's practical (no one behind me, or it's very easy to get around me), shutting off my engine during long stops (one red light near work is a three-minute cycle). I do **not** teilgate, seriously over-inflate my tires (I run them no more than 5 psi over the manufacturer's recommendations). I've gone from an average of 25 mpg around town to 31 mpg around town just with these few simple modifications to my driving style. On Sunday morning, I drove 12 miles across town to a friend's house and got 44 mpg for that trip. I didn't make a single stop during the trip--I was able to coast towards red lights (no one behind me) and was still coasting when the light turned green.  I don't own a hybrid. I have a conventional Honda Civic. I could probably get even better mileage if I was willing to forgo the A/C, but SW Florida in the summertime isn't bearable without A/C, so I use it and pay the extra money in gas willingly.
procrastination won't make you go that far. You are thinking about what scenario?
[cartoonist, Matt Milby](http://malfunctionjunction.net/?p=307) has also had similar issues..
What do you mean? I replied to your comment rather than my own to show that I was doing it in response to your point.
Spot on.
I have remarkably good short-term memory, but fairly poor detail peripheral vision. Every number I saw, I remembered, but there were several where the numbers were grouped in two clumps on either side of the screen, and I only had time to glance at one of the clumps. It wasn't that I didn't *remember* the numbers I'd seen, just that I didn't see them all. Thus, flawed test. I'm not entirely sure how one would fix that. *My score was 24*
White was murdered - see the updates.  The only person who could get in to the cells is a correctional officer or someone let in by a correctional officer. In max the inmates are let out - when they are let out - for short periods and not all together. For a suspect like that in there, they may have gone into complete lock down anyway. Now, here's the thing, my guess is that we are going to hear that the injury may have occurred while in the arresting officer's custody. Doesn't make corrections role less important - they do intake - they had to see something.
I got the reference. I have not only read the book 3 times in my life, I have read the full apendices.  I was just pointing out that in the UK all televisions (or "telescreens") require a license!   Just because I didn't take the time to comment "OH 1984 reference which is not obscure" doesn't mean I completely missed it.
...And dance by the light of the moon.
Not much apperently http://cgi.ebay.com/1923-Germany-5-Million-Mark-Note-Pick-95_W0QQitemZ380042267908QQihZ025QQcategoryZ3434QQssPageNameZWDVWQQrdZ1QQcmdZViewItem
yea its amazing
&gt; ... a strong culture of unit testing, helps a lot here. Since I don't really see perl written this way I can't really compare.  Perl has a strong culture of unit testing.  Seven years ago, I extracted the core of the most promising test library into a reusable library itself, then re-implemented the former code in terms of the new code.  Seven years later, there are hundreds of available testing modules which all work together in the same programs seamlessly.  &gt; Additionally, because the language syntax is very simple, Smalltalk is quite easy for a person to parse and figure out what's going on.  Perhaps Smalltalk *syntax* is, but Smalltalk *programs* aren't -- unless you're using an image which includes the aforementioned magic candy-flavored unicorn.  I've seen nothing in Smalltalk that enforces every maintenance concern I mentioned in my previous post.  &gt; Perl, on the other hand, has an incredibly complicated syntax that pretty much guarantees that any large codebase written by a lot of people will diverge substantially.  You can look up syntax in the manual.  You can't look up what poorly-named variables or functions do.  I'm not going to excuse poorly chosen syntax (and please feel free to get in line behind me when it's time to complain about Perl's dereferencing syntaxes), but in the real world, where I've seen people write to and read from files because they don't know arrays exist, I find it very difficult to believe that syntax is the biggest maintenance problem in a language.
So you would characterize NDP policies as "very liberal"?  The poll question is nonsense despite your apologies for it. :)
you can smoke it.
More to the point, I believe most American families have more than 1 car. Keep the petrol car for the drive across America, replace the other one with an electric for commuting.
At other points in life, you can choose not to hang around people who are going to invite *everyone but you* to the party.  Schoolchildren do not have this choice.  Even when it happens in a workplace, if the dynamic between one person and the group is that bad, that person can usually choose to work elsewhere.  Schools make these rules explicit--if you are going to hand out the invitations at school, you invite your whole class.  Otherwise, you find a way to do it after school.
Duh. I lived in Canada for two years... on the west coast in Vancouver. Canadians are peace loving, tolerant, prosperous, and happy. They understand the balance between rights and responsibilities. When you say responsibilities to a U.S. citizen, they don't like that word. They call socialism on it, but I think an understanding of responsibilities to our fellow citizens is necessary for freedom. That is lacking here in the US, and so, it's every man/woman for himself along with delusional hate for the poor and worship of the rich.
But this we're talking about the movie industry. Which is historically run, more or less, by people of Jewish ancestry. Studio heads are the last industry titans I'd call "Nazi loving".
shit be freaky underwater.
You mean... the Nikon d40 that just got replaced by the Nikon D60?
They're not Jews, but they are Zionists for the most part.
Excellent idea episcope. Why didn't I think of it earlier?  We, the Redskins, shall send all the Pale Faces to a refugee camp in Jenin and claim for ourselves our God given land.
why does lucy have more of a mustache than bart?
Aw come on, he's cute in that "murderously cantankerous old bastard" sort of way.
The breasts in that video are proof of divinity.
is it good or bad that I'm only 6 years older when drunk?
I've seen that boy on various tv shows before, and his mom is awesome, [not only for encouraging her son](http://www.benunderwood.com/aboutme.html), but also cuz her name is Aquanetta.  
Yup, if you're obviously drunk, don't take the test.  You're license will likely be suspended for a year (CA) but you won't have anything on your record.
I was just talking with a co-worker today - in her early 50's, who confessed that she was voting for McCain because "it's easier to tell her friends that she's voting for McCain rather than explain to them the reasons she would have voted for Obama."  I called her an American-hating pig because she wasn't wearing a flag pin.
I think he's more the original Bond. Cocksure, but has no reason to be.
Sigh.
Don't give blood either.  Your religion doesn't allow it.  It looks too much like spaghetti sauce, and that's sacrilegious, right?
yeah, it's that bad. I live in Alexandria, VA and can only get Verizon. And not even FIOS.
Curiously missing from story:  2 Illegal aliens, and Extensive criminal back grounds.  BTW, am I the only one that noticed he looks like Hardy from Laurel and Hardy?
The fact that there is actually a DEBATE over the evolution theory in your country just baffles me.
"And then...and then...and then? And then along came Jones!"
We're getting wealthier now?  The states must've given us that 'internet munay'.
Pretty obviously just a filter that went awry. They probably just decided awhile back to go with the more PC "homosexual" instead of "gay" and just instituted a filter site-wide rather than rewrite thousands of articles- and then the site admin forgot about it.  Saying that the news service "refuses to write Gay" is just absurd.
Do you have an earlier example of its usage?  http://www.google.com/search?hl=en&amp;q=%22is+hard%22+%22let%27s+go+shopping%22+simpson&amp;btnG=Search  EDIT: It seems that there was some sort of barbie doll that actually said this and that is where the simpsons gag came from.
Having spent some of my childhood in one of those churches, I could only watch about 10 seconds before turning it off.  The pressure to conform is HUGE.  My coping mechanism was being still and silent and eventually they'd pass over me.  At the time, I wondered why the holy spirit didn't love me enough to move me to speak in tongues.  What a fucking nightmare.
oh no, I'M USING THE CAT BRUSH!
Because he's a toolbag douchemonger.
I'm sure by the time 2012 comes around, he'll have forgotten ever even running for president.
You can be both angry and polite, although yes, it is harder when you're drinking.
Did *your* mother have any kids that lived?
Black on white to get shit done.  Green on black is for when you're showing off.
&gt;Since when did Israel have the right to sink US ships because the US ship "accidentally captured" private Israeli radio comms? Nevermind that even, when did Israel gain the right to kill US servicemen?
Roseanne is calling.
I couldn't complete the game because I kept waiting for the screaming face to pop up.
Lasagnacat.com redeems his life's work.
1 skill that every gamer should master:  talking to girls.
What's this racist nonsense? I thought Jews were white. Or are they?
I highly agree with the anti voice thing. 99% of my non-work communication is accomplished using the email, texting and instant messaging services all from my blackberry. Working in a tech support call center makes me hate talking in general, not just on the phone.
Programming seems to attract the type of guy you are describing.  Their angry instance on a world view that is representative of the things that they value ultimately leads them to some form of burnout. So I guess there is hope .. for humanity  edit: their -&gt; there
I am 22 and got 53, so it could be worse.
I think it should be a holler of fools.
DUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUURRRRR VOTE RON PAUL FOR PRESIDENT!!!!!
Pair programming, in my opinion has some benefits. I have tried it on three occasions.  In one case, I was working with a test developer. This person was a coder who primarily wrote code to test other people's code. Pair programming with her ended up being me coding and her asking questions to make me defend all my choices, which was OK, but really just kept me from achieving flow. Ultimately she said that she learned a lot from watching me and she had a good understanding of the API we developed and was able to write test cases against it.  Second two cases were with interns I had working for me. Neither of them asked as many questions and once we got the pretty far, they were able to write tools to work with the codebase I was writing.  If your goal is for the person who is "watching" to understand what is being written really well, then I guess it is OK. I have not really done pair programming with someone else at my skill level.
no, i heard some girl on the street just two days ago complaining about that very thing.
Some of the girls look like they could be from here, but I don't think they were in Brasil.
Go Bluetooth.  Used to hate walking or driving with my hand at the side of my head.   With voice recognition system, I, in my F150 2WD, am cooler than the clown in the Mercedes with his hand held up to the side of his stupid fucking head.   I love P.H.D. technology!
I was really high too, but forgot why I was doing this...
Haha Good eye, I didn't even notice the action figures. 
I own neither a TV nor a cell phone.  But I do have an internet tube going to my hut.
&gt;It is not frameworks I am adverse to it is a javascript framework of this level making it seem like you can write the entire application including things like business logic on the client side. A really bad idea for the web.  That's a good point, but that's a problem for any web architecture. I think that Objective-J would actually be *better* in this respect than, say, Flash or Java. With Objective-J, the availability of your source code is transparent. A little common sense should tell you not to put your business logic where it can be easily manipulated. This is not true of Java and Flash, both of which can easily be decompiled, but give the *illusion* of hiding your algorithms from the user. Programmers using Objective-J would, I think, be more likely to realize how easily their code can be seen and altered on the client side, than if they were using Java or Flash.  &gt;Even with some of my more javascript intense web applications the amount of javascript I write pales in comparison to back end code. Usually it is a bunch of display modification and UI code, then all the real logic is on the server side.  I think that the idea is aimed at people looking to make more desktop-esque apps like 280Slides. For something like that, there's really no reason for the server to do much more than storing and loading the data you create. A very large chunk of the app is in the interface, so I can definitely see the point. But for something more server-intensive, I think you're definitely right.
reddit and digg are both shitholes. Well reddit is still good, but  not for long.
I still have a feeling that [Lance Armstrong](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Lance_armstrong#Physical_attributes) is some kind of mutant, his body processes lactate better than other people, which isn't as obvious as some other mutations. 
Ziggy  he makes Garfield look funny and clever.  Ziggy's creator must be evil incarnate
I would suggest that the natural condition of most men is peace and harmony, however there are a few that stir up trouble and ruin things for the rest of us.
It might also happen from contact with your partner's fluids, esp vaginal secretions. Mr, redheaded, if you are ever going to get physical with somebody, you must be ready for some messy business!  One way to avoid it is to urinate after intercourse or ejaculation. Just don't fall sleep immediately! :) 
I find it kind of scary that he doesn't realize taking photos of cops is not a crime. Like the police state mentality is already becoming ingrained in people's minds....
Right its completely faddish. In fact I would call it an attempt of the author to try to define in strict terms what his idea of a good programmer is. It is at its most useful form a list of what the author found important at the time of its writing and cant be relied on universally for evaluating talent. While these items are an indicator of someone having solid programming experience. It can only really describe the type of work environment and/or environment that the person has worked in. A great programmer can not be guaranteed by any checklist. If this was a possibility then resume parsers that could generate job offers would have emerged long ago.  A very important factor in the "good" programmer equation is a sociological one. Each team and project is different. A good programmer for one project may not be good for another. As teams grow larger the ability for programmers to be in sync with the needs of the team and the needs of the business may not translate directly to crystallized technical knowledge and may even be exaggerated given the correct circumstances. 
I laughed.
Watterson earned his retirement, and after years of quiet spite for his decision to end the strip, I realized it was infinitely better that he quit while he was ahead. Given his personality, it's a wonder we got the decade he gave us.
And the inverse of that is the number of STD exchanged.
Ah, must have been named in anticipation of the next ~1001 years of suing.
Good pick up, but wouldn't it be "SAM"?
Yea, that is what javascript has done to the web, make it barely functional.
no this pinhead was not mentally retarded.
I was starting to like him.  Now I think he sucks and I'm voting for Bob Barr.
I had to read that several times not to just think I was losing it!  Pro Tip: Always send your article to a competent editor.
sushi mice vote up for me.
Yeah, waste that vote.
There is no confusion. It is deliberate acceptance of what they know is a lie. Gives them cover not to vote for a darkie.
Well, the UPnP would be blocked by anyone with a consumer router--since UPnP uses broadcast messages, and I don't think a notification interface exists anyway. The client app is just unappealing from both a customer and provider perspective for many reasons.
Hmm does your browser say what URL it's trying to load? Thanks for the heads up too btw. 
Slightly??
But seriously, there were a few.  I was just wondering which one was him?
I think this is dependent on your own region's rules for quotation marks.  For example, in America supposedly the custom is to include the trailing punctuation mark within quotes, no matter what. So it makes sense that hyperlinks would follow the same rule.  The rule I follow (even though I live in America) is that if the thing in quotes can work like a word by itself, then the punctuation mark goes outside the quotation marks. Well that's not really the rule, but that's how I think of it. So for me, it makes sense that hyperlinks are always like words, so the period is never included in the hyperlink text.
Cancel or allow?
I've fallen, and I can't get up.
Sweet response.
One of the truths that this great thinker expressed in simple terms was that: “In the social production during their lives, men establish certain necessary relations independent of their wills, relations of production which correspond to a given phase of development of their material productive forces. It is not man’s consciousness which determines its being, but on the contrary, it is its social being which determines its consciousness. On reaching a given phase of development, society's material productive forces come into contradiction with existing production relations...From forms of development of the productive forces, these relations become obstacles to the latter and an era of social revolution thus begins...No social formation disappears before its productive forces are fully developed and no new and more advanced production relations emerge before the material conditions for their existence have matured within the old society".
&gt;“We are incredibly pleased to see Age of Conan turning into an MMO phenomenon,” said Gaute Godager, Game Director on Age of Conan.  no shit?
They were on the Gold Standard back then.  Ron Paul approves.
`....................../´¯/)`  `....................,/¯../`  `.................../..../`  `............./´¯/'...'/´¯¯`·¸`  `........../'/.../..../......./¨¯\`  `........('(...´...´.... ¯~/'...')`  `.........\.................'...../`  `..........''...\.......... _.·´`  `............\..............(`  `..............\.............\... `  ;-)
Cool, Human evolution in action.
reddit: curing AIDS, cancer and boredom since 2005
an ADHD design technique. I'll be damned if it's any way to build a non-trivial system.
I noticed how every single female had a low back tattoo.  Very common among porn stars.  Especially online.
I'd noticed that before, and I'm slightly baffled by the use of compile-time strings to denote functions when the language already features anonymous functions. 
[Who the fuck](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=zOw9GHpVK0E) sings this song then?
[Original theme music for the video](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ZOyEQcvmuxU)
Firefox wasn't out then, either.  And whoever did it left Photoshop open...
Or what you don't do, to be more exact.
I don't know...  He wasn't ominous like in the book, it was like he needed his Ritalin or something.  And yeah, the first task was stupid.  I mean, you'd think the dragon handlers would have thought of having dragon restraining techniques that could restrain a dragon.  And the third was stupid too.  Since when does hollywood deliberately remove the excitement?  They replaced huge monsters with unfriendly vines?  WTF! 
Real age = 38 Scored age = 29  Not bad for a hard core pothead who smokes a pack a day.
No.  I won't be voting for him.  It's called The Constitution.  Our country is sort of founded on the thing.  Kind of a building block.  So, I won't vote for a guy who votes to undermine it, when his job is to uphold it.  Green Party it will be. Obama has no idea how many people he lost with this move.
No job future for you @ Faux News then...
Come on we all know the detention of crazy terrorists without a trial they don't deserve is the actions of God's tool himself.  These GUYS are CRAZY.  THEY KILLED AMERICANS ON 9/11!  C'mon habuos corrpis or whatever is a JOKE of an OLD DOCUMENT which doesn't mean a THING.  You stupid commiefags.
isn't this the test that apes score better on than college students, anyway?  srsly.
On the other hand, suppose I am quoting you saying:  "Beers."  I am supposed to write, if I were to question you:  Did you just say "Beers?"  Even though you didn't say  "Beers?"  ...you said  "Beers."
Reading the above article at its source reminds me of a search I have been on for a word for this. I seem to have once known it and it has escaped my mind. It is a perceived state of grace that describes these events well. It is a word that describes that place where you are supposedly forgiven for your own grievous sins because of the purity and sanctity of your higher purpose and goal.  Can ANYONE on reddit help me with this and put this bugaboo to rest for me? It drives me crazy that I can't remember it. Please?
Really interesting business plan.   Basically you have to pay 100 gallons up front at today's prices and 29.95/yr for membership, and then when you pay at the pump, you only pay the price that you locked it in for.
The whole page/story was about a guy fighting the people who booted his car -- as some part of you knows already.  Do you actually disagree about that? Am I an arbitrary decider of topics for claiming that?  It takes a lot of self-discipline to be intellectually honest during disagreements. I've been waiting to see how far you will end up going or not going in that sense, but it appears you've already decided that I am not being intellectually honest.
don't feed the troll.
You mean a good rule from XKCD. Give credit where credit is due.
&gt;What about those hot female teachers who just get probation?   Not this article. Some of the cases I'm aware of the female teachers went to jail.  To me, the law should be very hard on people who have sex/molest kids below puberty and not as hard when the kid is past puberty. But that's just my opinion. When I was in high school, I dated a couple of adult women (one was 27, the other in her mid thirties) and I can't point to any long term negative consequences (I'm mid thirties now).
Is it as good as the Iron Giant? I really loved that animation, which is so underated.
Because that is what you hear in the media. What about the hundreds of musicians and artists who haven't done anything too?
This is an interesting article with a fresh point of view.
Until everybody cancels after their first month.....
They buried the "Obama is a gun grabber" earlier today.  So the lying has begun too. 
Everything needs to be sorted by penis.
A lot of websites have dynamic functions that work in-page if you have Javascript enabled, but require posting data via a form and reloading the entire page if you don't have it enabled.
Good idea.
All I saw was "great ocean migration" and "cow".
I guess Violet and Xeni finally broke up.  It's such a shame; they seemed so happy together.
Damn!
Yeah. Plus we tend to bother less about cleaning up, so it's maybe even more common. Happened a lot more when I was young, for some reason.
And the hundreds of mini suicidal submarines...
A sewer of horses.
Excellent article.  Alternative schools need to be arranged strictly for truth.  Our children must carry the torch of liberty.  Private school is even worse.  They charge for conformity.  I am tired of living in this state.  We are the fuel for their tyranny.
Real age : 32. Scored Age: 32. Wow!
I think that the first "these pictures" is worst at different levels. After those babies pop, the skin needs to lubricate and heal itself...This leads to the skin to smell or stink.
At least on posts that have replies, the asterisk is really necessary for when people try to change history.  Personally, I'd prefer a unified diff history for comments, but failing that, the return of the asterisk would be an improvement.
Yeah, that's basically what I meant by "when it makes sense".  If I hit a light at a big intersection when it first turns red I'll turn off the engine.  If I can see that there's no way that I'll hit it, I just push the clutch in and coast up to it, etc...
Yeah, I just got a cell phone last year. Oddly enough I don't use it very much -- I don't often trade numbers or call up the people that I do have.
"s/he's/you're/" means to find instances of "he's" in my comment and replace them with "you're". I never said the word "he's", nor did I say "you're" or even use "your" improperly if you had it the find and replaces terms reversed.  **Edit:** Nevermind, I get it now ;)
Well with it being George W. Bush I thought one might assume it to be in America.(the 48 states)
[MAFFS](http://www.fs.fed.us/fire/aviation/fixed_wing/maffs/system.html).
Don't you think Edgar Cayce on George Carlin would be better?
I always figured those were for kids.
 Congressman, there's no need to feel down  I said, Congressman, pick yourself off the ground  I said, Congressman, 'cause you're in a new town  There's no need- to- be- un- happy-   Congressman, there's a lobbyist I know  I said, Congressman, when you're short on your dough  You can help him, and I'm sure you will find  Many ways- to- have- a- good- time-   It's fun enacting the D.M.C.A.  It's fun enacting the D.M.C.A.  We have all of the wealth... for executive joy  You can hang out with the- old- boys-   It's fun enacting the D.M.C.A.  It's fun enacting the D.M.C.A.  You can pocket the bribe  You can have a good meal  You can do what-ev-er you- feel-   Congressman, are you listenin' to me?  I said, Congressman, can you stifle free speech?  I said, Congressman, you can make real that dream,  but you've got to know this one thing:   No man... does it all by himself  I said, Congressman, put your oath on the shelf  And just- vote yeah, for the D.M.C.A.  I said we'll- pay- dou-ble- to-day-   It's fun enacting the D.M.C.A.  It's fun enacting the D.M.C.A.  We'll pay e-ve-ry-thing... your next campaign requires  And even when your Gold Card ex-pires   It's fun enacting the D.M.C.A.  It's fun enacting the D.M.C.A.  You can jail some coders  You can win on appeal  You can do what-ev-er you- feel-   Congressman, I was once in your shoes,  I said, I was- sick of new software tools  I felt- no man- wished to help me freeze time  I felt ex- ecs- Should- Own- All- rhymes-   ...That's when- someone came up to me  and said Congressman, take this check and you'll see  There's a bill now, called the DMCA  If you pass- it- you'll- be- well-paid -   It's fun enacting the D.M.C.A.  It's fun enacting the D.M.C.A.  We have ev-er-y-thing... for House Reps to enjoy  You can hang out with the- old- boys-   D- M- C- A- yeah-  D- M- C- A- ...
You just put a poisoned barb right through my childhood memories. 
And Down Goes Frazier!  Down goes Frazier!
Grab my ass real quick.
You'd have to be nuts to have not seen this shit coming a mile off. Still, I'm not cheering higher food and energy prices, I'm cheering a move to a hopefully more sustainable lifestyle, in the end we'll all benefit from that.
Any UC Davis Aggies out there?  You know what bathroom I'm talking about then.  Not as a bad, but close.
What we need is to stick this on a spaceship.  Prolonged acceleration? Would make a trip to Mars a cinch.  Unfortunately, this is a ramjet. It needs air to work.
Has Digg fully taken over Reddit? Seriously contemplating moving on to something better.
And so it begins...
A good rule of thumb about the age you should date if you're middle-class or lower. If you're rich like Jack Nicholson you can date 18-year-olds when you're 70 and nobody will bat an eye. Haha. Money really does buy everything. 
Great, more to grow up as socially inept, emotionally distant morons with puritanical values.  
FTA:  "I feel fortunate because maybe someone else eats beans instead of hamburgers."  What the hell?
Doesn't this belong in the [funny](http://funny.reddit.com) subreddit?
You, and all the other Fox drones are too numerous to reply to in toto.   So I say to you; If you can't see that O'Lielly is a sick individual (as are most men who get slapped with sexual harassment suits after leaving unwanted **voice mail** to a woman), I have no words for you.   The fact that O'lielly makes himself a moon-sized target is no one's fault but his own.  His screeds barely make sense.   If Olbermann keeps choosing to poke the insane person in the pen (said person being well-paid to be there), that's his business.   I happen to find O'lielly funny in the same way K.O. does.   So you go ahead and enjoy the twisted rantings of a mind that was obviously potty-trained at gunpoint.   I'll enjoy listening to Mr. Olbermann's take on this ball of dirt.
You might as well vote for Ficus again. 
I think the biggest downside is that you're basically paying to carry around a tracking device. Sure, there are laws to prevent your location to be tracked only in emergencies, but as we can see from the telcom immunity, laws mean very little to the government.
Ok guys seriously now...WTF?
right
Thats because of the "federal" reserve.  Whether Ron Paul said it or not, having these fuckers print out large quantities of money makes the greenback worth less.  All republicans should be trying to dismantle big government, thats what being on the right means.  I don't know what the fuck the Christian-"Right" espouses, its not conservative.  Neo-Cons needs to stop calling themselves conservatives. 
I think the biggest downside is that you're basically paying to carry around a tracking device. Sure, there are laws to prevent your location to be tracked only in emergencies, but as we can see from the telcom immunity, laws mean very little to the government.
Wait,....lmfao. Yes, I'am sorry, you are correct. *06/30/2008, too late?
I live near Findlay, Ohio. We are not all booger-pickin' cousin-humpers.
Um, if you're writing them as `method(obj)` they're not instance methods.
I was scared to look in fear of seeing that I'm more of an idiot that what I already realize.
I feel your pain.  I was raised in a Pentecostal church where my great-grandfather was the pastor.  I remember the pressure, and I remember being dragged up to the alter with some other kids and having to put on a little half-hearted act just because I knew everyone was watching and waiting.  It WAS a nightmare.  Well, at least we got out of there eventually.
Who wants to have unprotected butt sex, raise yer hands!
Because it's a losing argument?
Agreed. I read this book and I am now an economics major. Why Globalization Works is a good read as well. 
If you don't think you've ever learned anything from the net, I feel bad for you.
Thats because of the "federal" reserve.  Whether Ron Paul said it or not, having these fuckers print out large quantities of money makes the greenback worth less.  All republicans should be trying to dismantle big government, thats what being on the right means.  I don't know what the fuck the Christian-"Right" espouses, its not conservative.  Neo-Cons needs to stop calling themselves conservatives. 
&gt; All it needed was a bump gear that engaged the other three flips every other 12 hour cycle.  Good lord!  that's true...
nobody said anything even closely resembling the word python. Why are you being upmodded?
I think that it would be a better test of memory if it gave just a moment more to look at the numbers - right now it's also testing how fast you can look at things.
:`(
"And then...and then...and then?  And then along came Jones!"
Quite simply, he retains these positions because he still caucuses with the democrats, and without his vote, the democrats would lose leadership of the senate.
if that is supposed to be an excuse, Obama was the candidate of change.  What's been brought in to question now is not whether or not Obama is the better choice, but to what extent he really represents change now.
This MI6?  http://cryptome.org/mi6-psyop.htm  Oh yeah, they've got lots more credibility than the CIA.
No, that makes Hasselhoff look sexy as hell.
I apologise and look deeper into my actions.
These idiots who are willfully ignorant are harming our country. I wish there was something we could do about it.
Fascinating, but why?
For example, where I live now, whites are not a majority and blacks are probably the fourth or fifth most highly represented ethnic group...
&gt; I've seen nothing in Smalltalk that enforces every maintenance concern I mentioned in my previous post.  That's fair, and I wouldn't claim that Smalltalk, or any other language, fixes this problem. All languages require code to be documented. That said, in the real world, code is frequently not well documented, and you're forced to go in to it and figure out what it's doing. Simple syntax and idioms make this easy. Perl has neither, which makes it more challenging than it needs to be.  &gt; I find it very difficult to believe that syntax is the biggest maintenance problem in a language.  What would you claim it is then? It certainly isn't the libraries, nor the implementation (which works quite well, even if it's ugly internally), nor the lack of documentation, nor any of the other usual bugbears. There are a fair number of people who claim that perl's syntax is absolutely a problem for them. I would say perl's problems really are in the language itself.
So they think that shouting nonsense and forcing children to act like they're having seizures is what "God" wants? 
Not surprising this won't hit the front page.  People have trouble dealing with their own hipocracy.   Everyone is bad but Reddit posters.
who the fuck are you?
I hear they were selling those as promotional watches for season two of Lost.  "Hey, want to feel like all that ever happens is pressing the button, pressing the button?"
I came here to post this very thing. Fuck that.   Donating money to Obama is like giving money to a stripper. You might like what you see, but you still wont get what you want. 
Moron.  I was referring to Beck's lyrics.  I weave a general garment, and you claim it's cut to your fit?  Try getting over yourself.
No one is saying you can't question the general, but that MoveOn.org ad was over the top. "Betray-Us"? Gimmie a break. It really was a childish attack.
Sitting down or standing up doesn't make a difference for that.
yeah, but if we used traditional methods of getting it into space and then had the nuclear rockets kick in...  I think this is more kor56's point.
piff, sounds like a challenge. ::click:: ::BAMN::
Don't feel bad, nobody else does either.
Bob Knight and Dick Cheney should maybe go hunting together.  Bob has shot two or three people.
"I'm going to venture a guess that every single reader of this article is capable of telling stories similar to mine above."  I'm sure that's true. While I engage in informal transactions almost daily, one that particularly comes to mind is when I decided to get my car completely washed, shampooed, and vacuumed prior to selling it. The guy at the car cleaning shop offered me a big fat discount (30% off or more) if I paid in cash. I was only too happy to comply. He did an excellent job as well.
Well, to be exact, my country is past *its* prime.
also i found while looking  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Prince_Randian  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Saartjie_Baartman
very insightful comment.  thanks.
So am I, but try entering "did you vote for Bush?" and see what happens.
Why the FUCK, does a website like this exist? Who could possibly enjoy this‽
well if I can make one person te he a day I know my life is worth living :-) have a good one mate. 
Paper half gallons ftw.
So why again are we being told to be scared of big bad Iran like it's some big threat?
It's their heart stopping that does it.
This made me look at lisp.  Ok, fuck.  So everything is a function, including -, +, *.  Also, I can't get past the parenthesis?  Seriously, does it eventually become easier to read all these nested parenthesis, which I already hated using other programming languages, and which I normally do something like this: (vector math functions)   add (    cross (g,     mul(c, d)    ),    mul (a, c)   )  Which still is ugly to me. Is there a website where I may review the key differences in thinking that lisp provides?  So far, everything I've seen looks the same as I'd write it in C (minus the parenthesises).
Exactly. Compare other social sciences with a lot of math and use of the scientific method (economics, pyschology, political science) with social sciences with almost no math or statistics (sociology, cultural anthropology). The latter are in a very sad state these days. 
I'm rearranging all my desktop icons into something more useful tomorrow.
This one should be doomed for failure.
Circus of Garden Delights. West 34th Street/Penn Station Subway tile mosaic art #3 [Detail #1] as seen at NYC's West 34th Street stop at 8th for the A, C and E trains. 
in part 2: the exchange server database is corrupted, and the backup tapes are DOA
This sounds like the makings for soylent yellow. This concerns me.
&gt; David "I wear diapers while fucking sluts" Vitter   I believe his whores call him "Vitter the Shitter."  Just FYI.
I wish there was some way to edit a typo in the submission title but there is not..  Anyway full article from the picture above can be viewed at http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Lung_Cancer
keep trying
&gt;Would it be unreasonable for a committed pacifist to disown his child if his child supported the bombing, or even the military takeover, of Iran?  Yes. Totally and completely.   The bond of parents and children goes beyond ideological boundries. As long as both the parent and child were open minded and had ample evidence to support their view points, both should mutually respect each others decisions.  I don't think you're fully comprehending the action of disowning.  We're saying, that based on ideological differences, a parent would say "You are no child of mine, get away from me and never come back, ever."  It's absolutely no different than parents disowning gay children, and just as disgusting.
I'm 20 and got a score of 38 ... what does that even mean?
Is that a CDADR I see before me?
There is a contradiction between you saying that her books are long winded and pedantic and the army of fanboys who keep voting them up as top recommendations. They aren't voting for them for their quality of narrative or characterization, they are voting because they are mindless followers of a shallow belief system who (ironically) want to elevate mediocrity to the loftiest peaks.
When you say "son-of-a-bitch", do you mean that literally?
He is talking about the x-axis of the bell curve, while you are talking about the y-axis.
How do they suffer? They have exactly what they had before you carried out your private transaction. The only difference is that you and the person you dealt with are both better off. And the people (family, etc.) you support. And all the other businesses at which you will spend the money you just earned or saved. And all the businesses at which they will spend *that* money. Etc.
Just joking.  I figured it was a foregone conclusion that she would be back since Toby quit, they introduced her, and she did a great job.  I can't think of one good reason she *wouldn't* be back.  Same as Jim.
Gold
I think we all know the U.S. military can fuck up any country at anytime they want to. They have a problem with what comes after the fucking up, as we have all seen since Mission Accomplished. And we all believe him, many Redditors have said that Iran is not a threat and all this saber rattling is part of our insane foreign policy.
I might kill them if they tried to feed them to me. Why dont they just call it sweaty feet flavour. Maybe it was one of those obscure expensive chips like honey glazed ham something like that.
Change -- the real thing -- is coming. Wait for it. Only 7 more months.
er... is higher number better or smaller number? im 26 and got a 34 and then i re-did it and got a 31...  eh?
What the mother getting boned by the dog, and the father knobbing the turkey at the dinner table? I guess so.
She's addicted to plastic surgery. It's sad.
Any Redditors know who still sells these candies? I used to eat them as a young lad, and now feel the urge to go get some for old time sake.
"Feck Off Crows" sounds like it would be a good name for a band.
if you had said "but secs" then maybe i would have taken you less seriously and thus, granted you your request.
Sure, but I was only responding to "Wow, her dress sure is funny. Let's BOMB IRAN AND KILL ALL THEIR CHILDREN! Bush FTW!"
the website is seriously down.
Old news.
good point
Everyone at reddit is level 3 on this matrix.
Still: California &gt; Canada. 
to commemorate rock band 2 being announced
25 and got a twenty.  Is it good to have a young brain?  That's not a compliment you usually get.  "He's 25 but he's got the brain of a healthy 20 year old."
I believe the article mentioned jetpack guy's huge balls as being the mutant-part of his "superpowers"...
Strangers are surprised that I don't have a cell phone, but people who know me aren't so surprised. No friends = no need for a cell phone.
I'm 15 and got 36.  I've always been terrible at this on Brain Age.
&gt;You have approved of what the Turks did to the Greeks in the 20's.  I don't but it's important to point out that the state of israel denies this genocide occurred.  &gt;The on-going Arab-Israeli War.  Try again. There is no such war. If there was such a war every prisoners being tortured in israeli dungeons would be classified as prisoners of war.  Israel denies they are POWs and you do too I bet. It does that in order to deny them human rights, to prevent visits from the red cross and other agencies and of course so it can continue to smash the testicles of 12 year old boys in front of their fathers. There is nothing an israeli enjoys more than torturing little kids.   Make up a more believable lie next time mkay?
I don't think it's that strange to have a memorial of types for your stillborn. Mind you, only people unfamiliar to the internet would put stuff there, but still....
Yes - but in this case, you've got a very strong selective regime, so you should see convergence sometime. 
&gt; Firefox can't establish a connection to the server at www.thewebsiteisdown.com.  At least it lives up to its domain name.
Good idea. The guy who plays Jon ruins it though, I am sorry to say. I can't even understand what he's saying, to say nothing of the delivery. The dead-pan style is on the right track but the acting doesn't work. Reminds me of David Lynch's Rabbits. 
And he doesn't cut their mike. You, like so many who responded to my comment, miss the point entirely.  Kinda like Bill-o usually does. K.O. has people on to explain and deepen our understanding of the issue at hand. Olbermann does not have guests on to fight with, yell at, talk over, and ultimately, unplug.   But you go ahead and enjoy some bread with your circuses.
Lee Atwater was legendary for his ability to get way back up in the alley for a tactical move on an opponent.  If you remember he went out with a tragic brain tumor.  There is a mind body connection that manifests in karmic ways.  
By the same token I never can take the NY Times that seriously.  Any paper that takes itself so seriously as to not have comics, is... a bit of a joke.  
It's a trap!
Is it really this simple?
In the end, Microsoft will be forced to by either Apple, Novel or Redhat.  The intractable problem they have is that any "new platform" they come up with will only make IT departments say "...well lets just migrate to [MacOS, Linux, etc]".  From a business perspective they should do 2 things; buy Apple no matter the cost, and release XP 2008 (which will just be an updated, enhanced version of XP).  Vista is a flop. Any "new platform" will be just as big of a flop.
Dammit...  &gt; Connection Interrupted  &gt; The connection to the server was reset while the page was loading.  &gt; The network link was interrupted while negotiating a connection. Please try again.
It's almost akin to religious conviction.
boylan is another soft drink company who uses cane sugar, pretty good stuff, i would steer away from thier diet drinks, anything 'diet' aswell  http://soda-pops.blogspot.com/2006/04/boylans-cane-cola.html (quick link to ingredients) http://www.boylanbottling.com/  personal commentary/rant: there is apparently a war on sugar judging from most foods and drinks, and what you see in the media telling people off of sugar and onto chemical and engineered sweeteners  wtf is wrong with sugar??   honey is another ingredient i have been thinking could make a great soda, mix with a bit of water, throw in some carbonated water and flavorings and chill, instant and healthy refreshment!
All of Spain's midfield:  * Xavi * Senna * Fabregas * Silva * Iniesta
Correct.
That's what I figured.  But I'm an analog guy most of the time, anyway.  ;-))
By my read, yes, and any other steam turbine application.  Good newz if it's real!
Related: http://www.filmwad.com/why-christian-bale-is-a-badass-3999-p.html  (That made the rounds about a year ago, but if you haven't seen it, It's New To You!)
I'm sure there's a noscript setting for that.
Half of your spinless party supports the same shit, don't try an act like it's only one person.
&gt;Or course: Israeli occupied Gaza and the West Bank in 1967.  OK. Now lets see if the UN recognizes this occupation as being legal or not.  In the mean time I await your comment telling me how this occupation is perfectly moral and ethical under jewish culture and ethical system.  &gt;Hamas just agreed to a temporary cease-fire, not to negotiate a peace treaty allowing the existence of a Jewish state.   Hey maybe this is an opportunity!!.  Nah what am I saying. Israel doesn't want peace. It never has.
The Structure and Interpretation of Computer Programs: Abelson &amp; Sussman  Software Tools: Kernighan &amp; Plaugher  The Practice of Programming: Kernighan &amp; Pike  Programming Pearls: Bentley  Code Complete: McConnell  and if you're really ambitious...  The Art of Computer Programming: Knuth
The dog's eying him up though.
Gore/Lieberman might have been even worse.
I'm 20 and got 26 :( I think I need to start drinking more.
Especially considering that he claims to be cured of HIV, no doubt largely due to his fame and wealth.
The name of that agenda: "taking the piss"
You can't sort them by penis, damnit.
didn't want to post a RTSP link, but watch [here](rtsp://video1.c-span.org/archive/c08/c08_062408_hart1.rm)  rtsp://video1.c-span.org/archive/c08/c08_062408_hart1.rm  Jesus Christ, where do these people get their news? The is fucking depressing, its like they have no intellectual curiosity, the fact that the mainstream media has documented bias isn't enough for these morons to fact check even the most basic of assertions.
They sell pot in packs now?
Parentheses aren't replacements for curly brackets and semicolons.  I'd probably write it:   (add (cross g (mul c d))    (mul a c))  if I didn't put it all on one line.
&gt;...because they're surrounded by people who want to "push them into the sea"  So? It's not like any of them can.  &gt;...people who fire rockets into their cities  The palestenians have the right to defend themselves.  &gt;...people who use suicide bombers on a regular basis  The palestenians have the right to defend themselves.  &gt;...people who have attacked them before and will attack them again.  The palestenians have the right to defend themselves.
I thought the joke was that the website is down.  &gt;Failed to Connect  &gt;Firefox can't establish a connection to the server at www.thewebsiteisdown.com.        &gt;Though the site seems valid, the browser was &gt;unable to establish a connection. &gt; &gt; * Could the site be temporarily &gt;unavailable? Try again later.  &gt;   * Are you unable to browse other sites?  &gt;Check the computer's network connection. &gt; * Is your computer or network protected &gt;by a firewall or proxy? Incorrect settings &gt;can interfere with Web browsing.           
Who's doing the math on this?  700,000 accounts is not enough to be number 2, lineage and lineage 2 both have around a million.
Degenerating to ad hominem attacks tells me you lost the argument.   Obamas executive experience? Community organizer. After that he rolled himself into the corrupt Chicago political machine and is a reliable leftist (liberal, progressive, whatever) in the state house. He got elected to the US Senate and immediately started running or President. His political blather is laughable nonsense that is useful if only to point out the ignorance and gullibility of his supporters.
I'm saved!
That's the part that pisses me off the most.  I bought a house I could easily afford and I'm being punished for it because of all those fucking idiot house flippers and no-doc mortgages out there who destroyed the market.  On top of the free falling price of my house the money I managed to save is being eroded by all the inflation created to try and save this sorry ass country.  We are not even close to sinking to the bottom of this shit pool yet. We'll have four years of Obama trying to paint a pretty picture of our crumbling empire followed by a yet to be determined authoritarian asshole who will sell this country on a world war to try and reclaim our 'rightful' status as a super-power.  We are fucked.
Maybe I'm just naive, but I thought Code Complete was a bit pointless.  A few good bits of wisdom mixed in with a whole lot of common sense and bureaucracy.
That rule had been around decades before anyone ever heard of XKCD
I wonder what the guy on the background is looking at on the last picture, he has a "WTF!?" look on him.
&gt; I don't think a waiting period is unreasonable, especially as it will put guns into the hands of everyone- not just people who want to protect themselves.  I don't think a waiting period is unreasonable either, but I think it's kind of laughable to assume that not having one will in your words "put guns into the hands of everyone- not just people who want to protect themselves." All of the evidence seems to suggest that people who aren't simply trying to defend themselves can get to a gun quite easy while the individual who wishes to defend themselves is still tapping their feet.  While it's possible that there are a great many homicides which have been stopped because the waiting period somehow prevented a criminal from buying a gun, I really doubt it. Most studies that have looked into the matter have shown that criminals don't buy guns from licensed dealers. They get them through criminal channels which don't observe any gun regulations.
Cool, I'm glad he's happy. The Captain deserves it, ten times.
It means watch them jack up the interest rates and fees of otherwise good credit holders to staunch the losses of the bad credit people.  Watch them lower credit limits silently so they can sock people with over-limit fees.  Watch them solicit out new credit to people so they can rapidly sell it before they go sour as well.
That would be nice to believe.   At this point, after Abu Ghraib, the Marine who raped the thirteen year old and murdered her family, GITMO, the reports of horrific torture out of Afghanistan (made by military men) . . .   It looks to me like the wheels are falling off the military. On the one hand, those US men on the battlefield are in a wholly fucked up situation and the evil they do is on my hands and the hands of congress and coats the ugly bodies of all the folks at the top of this administration.  There is just no military objective at all in Iraq.  Really.  We can establish a puppet government (duly elected from approved candidates) but they'll be liquidated the second we leave . . . and so we can never leave. To stay we must keep killing . . . insuring that we are well hated and under constant threat by the nation we are occupying.  I think men like my father (who fought in WWII) and who ran Nurmeburg trials SPECIFICALLY to indicate that there are rules in war, would be disgusted that less than 100 years later, crap like Abu Ghraib, Gitmo etc can still happen.  It really should not be possible. Torture is covered in the UCMJ. The Geneva Conventions cover collective punishment and clearly outline war crimes that cover shooting unarmed women and children, etc.  Military men in the field are not just able to stop this crap, they are _obligated_ to stop it.  I am just at a loss.  What needs to happen, is Bush and Cheney need to flung out of office. Pelosi as well for deciding that "impeachment is not an option".  And we need to put someone in charge who understands the last 100 years of military history -- particularly US military history. We need someone who will actually listen to the f*cking military.  Because the military war colleges predicted this. The military brass anticipated it.  And yet somehow no one in the military chain of command, from the lowliest grunt to the guys at the top of the chain will just pull the plug and say "Actually, we are violating a host of laws here  . . . and my unit is are standing down because it would be criminal to proceed."
The Republican Drug War can only extract money from the poor (from tax payers) by putting them in jail. None of this rule EVER applies to the elite. Everybody knows that the dice are loaded Everybody rolls with their fingers crossed Everybody knows that the war is over Everybody knows the good guys lost Everybody knows the fight was fixed The poor stay poor, the rich get rich That's how it goes Everybody knows 
Do you believe in UFOs, astral projections, mental telepathy, ESP, clairvoyance, spirit photography, telekinetic movement, full trance mediums, the Loch Ness monster and the theory of Atlantis? ....Ah, if there's a steady paycheck in it, I'll believe anything you say.
An Indian geek.
[citation needed]
for some reason you can type either
I actually made the same mistake a few months ago.  Got home, had a nap, and woke up around twilight thinking "How'd I spend the whole night on the couch? and why didn't my alarm go off?"  A look at the clock confirmed that I was late so I jumped off the couch, threw off some clothes, and drove to work.  Of course I was 12 hours off.  I got to work around 8:30 PM.  Of course it sounds like this kid is in grade school or high school.  I'm going after my PhD.
Please don't cure HIV, otherwise Africa will literally explode from overpopulation.
Epilepsy sure is rife in that village........!
Why wait for the revolution that will never come? Americans are fat, dumb and apathetic (apathy was substituted for happiness long, long ago) they wont really even consider revolting until they get hungry and start to feel truly powerless. Wish I could come up with an apropos Adams-esque witticism here, but frankly, I'm bit depressed after reading the article.
That's a pity; it adds flavor to China separate of the government that characterizes it now.
What does flash memory have to do with Brain Age?
&gt;If convicted, Simoes could face up to ten years in prison and a fine of $250,000.  Pigs will be flying the day a cop gets the maximum penalty for violating civil rights.
Yes, pot has been classified this way for a long time. To quote wiki;  "While many drugs clearly fall into the category of either stimulant, depressant, hallucinogen, or antipsychotic, cannabis, containing both THC and CBD, exhibits a mix of all properties, leaning towards hallucinogen properties due to THC being the primary constituent.[77][78][79]  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Cannabis_(drug)   As far as I know it is a mild hallucinogen. I have certainly smoked copious amounts and never seen any little pink elephants. In a mild hallucinogenic experience there is that expansive, thought-feeling-world embracing, relaxing to the center of self and other... a re-setting, an inter-connecting and quickening of self.. ahh..I probably sound like i am high...time to leave my work desk, go home, sit in the sun, and smoke a bowl while watching the butterflies. A good evening to all of reddit, always good to end on a positive note after reading politico b-s most my day. Hurrah for the good weed!
Voted up now that karma is out of the picture.
Assuming that you are serious, where have you been?  &gt;They can't very well convict you for buying drugs from him, and let him off the hook for selling them to you.  You need to watch some TV or read the papers.  If you are joking and I don't get it, well then, my bad. But damn.
Shockingly, they are instance methods.  `len( obj )` is really `obj.__len__()`, same with others such as `repr` and `str`.
Read the article.  I think K.O. should do whatever he likes.  The world is a serious place.   Bill-o makes for a good belly-laugh *just by being himself*.   I know it's not polite to make fun of those less fortunate than we, but O'lielly makes a Hell of a lot more money than I.   Fuck him.
That your choice in company in school is limited, you are correct.  However, as most public education institutes in the world mandate education until ages 16 or later, at what point does the child accept that for some reason, legitimate or petty, that his or her company is not wanted by another?  By the same token as a worker who may choose to work elsewhere (which for most in this situation, would be an unwise sole choice to leave an employer) would not a child be able to switch schools, or be pulled out of school by parents? That the child probably should not have handed out invitations during school hours, I do concede, though only as a policy regulating invitations, regardless of if they are exclusionary or not.  But I think, and do correct me, what we disagree on is the role a school should have in shielding a child from situations which harm self-esteem.  To attempt to hide this certain sort, if we can assume is based on personality on some level rather than race, gender, &amp;ct., is to only delay the inevitable social rejection one may face in one's lifetime, as well as the immediate social rejection, being the party in this case, which the children excluded would surely have learned about.  Back to the work example, if the child had not learned to deal with not being invited to a birthday party, how would he or she grapple with a similar situation in a work environment?  Surely, one cannot hop around jobs finding a suitable social atmosphere, while also maintaining necessary benefits, salary, &amp;tc.   The point is, a part of the learning process involves negative situations such as rejection, and to rob a child of that is to retard their social development.  Short of bullying, teasing, and other such truly harmful behaviors, a school should keep a hand out of social development. If I have perverted your original point, my apologies. 
If anyone uses this as a tool for any of my interviews when I graduate in a year, I'm fucked...
I half agree. Germany were lucky but Ballack was good.
Fake!!!  (good god I hope so)
Oceanographers are all liberals. Conservatives know the REAL science. Or some stupid crap. Conservapedia will tell you.
That's terrific, it really is.  But seriously Obama, no telecom immunity.
Don't you want to give money to a man with conviction.  I am tired of severely adjusting my principals to vote for lesser evils.  We blew our chance at liberty.  Ron Paul was the only person running for the people.  Ron Paul is already my President.  Who's with me!?!
What about Marmaduke?
I'm glad he got off, because people shouldn't be penalised under the law for using, possessing, or selling drugs.  However, he didn't get off because of that. He got off because his father pulled some strings. How many people have been sent to jail for years because their parent or parents didn't sit on the bench? Millions. It's sickening, and makes this guy's family deserving of a public roasting.
It may be 170 kg in mass, but it didn't weigh 375lb in the water.
You get old; you become an asshole. Happened to RN. Happened to Bill Clinton. It will probably happen to me, but I'm at least 10 years older than either of them and it hasn't happened yet.   Of course, neither Ralph nor Bill knows it's happened to them.
&gt; Dude, you've done nothing but.  Only in your mind.  &gt; Would you still be saying that if they were calling for life-saving medical treatment to be withheld from black patients if a white patient could not be saved?  Are they being tricked into it?  Are they trying to do some good?  Then yeah, I probably would be saying that.  I can't really conceive of how that would happen in your hypothetical situation, but if those things were somehow true, then I would at least be able to understand where they're coming from, and be able to perceive them as redeemable.  &gt; You perceive them as good people because you just don't see women's needless deaths as important enough to make a fuss over.  No, I just haven't dehumanized my enemy.  &gt; If they are, it's because they've chosen to be.  Agreed, in part.  They are willfully blind to some important things, on some level.  But again, that's a more redeemable position.  Also, I cannot release the deceivers from their culpability.  In regard to your edit in the last message: I will do that.  I don't think the outcome will be what you expect.
FORK
[:-)](http://www.reddit.com/r/happy/) &lt;-click
no one likes truth ;)
yatta!!  it's japanese. it doesn't need to mean anything. 
FAIL
meaning .... ?
Torres, Ballack, Fabregas, van Persie?
Good article, and SHOULD really **sound the alarm!**  Especially considering how Iraq went down.
I'm 29 and got a 25.  Is that good or bad?  I'm not sure I understand the idea of this.  Is the object to get a high score, low score, or somewhere in the middle?  If it truly tells the brains age then I certainly don't want to score as low as a 3, but not as high as like 100.
The free Microchip MPLAB IDE comes with a free version of the third-party HI-TECH PICC Lite C compiler, which supports a number of the lower end devices (some PIC12 and PIC16 devices). Student versions of Microchip's official compilers for all the other devices are free. After 60 days or so they turn off the higher-end optimization features, but for most hobbyists this doesn't matter much. There are also some free open-source compilers but I don't think the device support is very broad.  I don't have a lot of AVR experience but I believe you can get a completely free GCC-based toolchain that compiles C for these devices.  The main hurdle to entry for most folks is procuring a programmer/debugger, which can range from almost-free (build your own) to quite expensive ($100-plus). This is assuming you have other very basic electronics equipment, like a breadboard, a power supply (a 9V battery, 7805 regulator and two capacitors works just fine for many things), and wire.
&gt;Sure, I'm all for that, but lets send the college professors,  God knows we don't need any educated people in the US.  &gt;some new england politicians,  Yea, let's only keep the politicians from states with tiny populations. We don't really want a representitive democracy.  &gt;a union official or twenty  Fucking cops, fireman, plumbers, and teachers. Fuck them all.  &gt;some of the NAACP leadership,  Yea. Who needs the niggers anyway.   &gt;nd self help gurus.  Man if we got rid of them the crime rate would drop by a thousand fold. Fuck those self help gurus and their raping, killing, robbing ways.  &gt;If it makes you feel better thinking that without them that the world would be a better place, then go right ahead.   Well I do but obviously you think the world would be better without cops, teachers, plumbers, truck drivers, niggers, and people who want to improve themselves.  &gt;I've never been one to dispel someone else's disillusions, however misguided.  The only people you can convince of anything are your klan brothers.
BMW makes the 7 series. And that was the least douchey thing you said in your comment.
Sorry, just couldn't resist going all Julie Newmar (Catwoman, catty) on you. rawr
So does Stephen Colbert. 
You are not insensitive. That website is hideous.
some of it is just that it pops up so fast. it takes longer to receive and process info as you get older.
my thoughts exactly.
I was being facetious, only douchebags actually like Ron Paul, the same douchebags who put quotes around "free market" and then blame the gov'mint for everything from under their tin foil hat.
Oh come on Xray him to death? Not very likely.
They did lend the Yanks the use of their little island as an assembly point for the invasion.  That was worth quite a lot.  In particular, it saved western Europe from being Soviet client states after the war.  And seriously, the British did an awful lot in WW2.  Certainly a lot more than necessary to qualify as bit players.
Perhaps this is some sort of art piece? Like a carefully staged photo that represents the average reddit reader?
http://www.gandi.net/
i'm 25 and i got 25  on my second try..
I just published this post, have fun!
They didn't think to mention it at the time? "Excuse me, my hotel room is hot. No, not hot, I mean *hot*."
I just published this post, have fun!
That’s the way it’s done in [ply](http://www.dabeaz.com/ply/), which is what I choose when I decided to parse in Python recently.  The doc string trick is a bit un-Pythonic and non-idiomatic, but it works.
Indeed sir.  Note number six as well.  While the 4th Amendment prohibits illegal search and seizure of evidence, it really provides no penalty and therefore no incentive for police to follow the law.  This is partially because unlike in, for example, most European justice systems, police departments are not centralized and do not usually penalize officers on their own accord.  As such, the court invented the exclusionary rule which prohibits prosecutors from using evidence in violation of the 4th A to put some teeth into the law.  However, over the last sixty years, an increasingly "conservative" court has embraced the crime control model and has steadily eroded the rule.  The way the system is set up, the only times the 4th A will really be tested will be by a criminal defendant who has been convicted and whose conviction will likely be upheld or overturned based on the admission or suppression of the evidence in question.  In many cases, it seems a SC justice (think Scalia, Thomas, etc.) is too shortsighted to make the difficult decision to allow suppression of the evidence despite the criminal's obvious guilt.  Doing so is the only way to protect the many innocent people who are otherwise likely to be subjected to violative police behavior but will lack standing to shape the law precisely because the police will find nothing.  Instead, many justices will try and carve out an exception simply so they can avoid letting off the defendant at the center of the appeal.  In the short term this makes them feel righteous and warm inside but erodes all of our civil rights. /rant
As someone who lives right next to the PCC in Wedgewood, I can tell you that I go out of my way NOT to shop at PCC because their often absurd and capricious bouts of activism are a huge inconvenience to customers.  If I want to buy Coke, I don't want to have to spend $1 per bottle for the stuff from Mexico.  How the fuck can they pass off unpasteurized milk as a means of giving the customers what they want, but ban "Cherry Garcia," "Mug Rootbeer" and "Frosted Flakes?"  "We've decided it's not good for you, so we're not going to give you the option of buying it . . . but feel free to drink the unpasteurized milk, just keep in mind that you may need to be hospitalized."
Lucky I gave up my citizen-ship of the US Federal Gov in the District of Columbia before this 'Act'.  Now a free American on the land, - pay only State taxes.
i'm 50 and got a 33 so it evens out.
"No offense to drunks or sailors"   Lol!
How is that obvious? Blackwater is going (or has gone) full spectrum bud. Completely parallel (to US military) intelligence division, navy, army, air support, heavy armour the whole works. Don't buy the bullshit about how they're 'defensive only.'  Go buy Jeremy Scahill's book (the new edition) and find out for yourself. 
Reddit? Wait...
What a great sketch! Not many comedy shows can said to have contributed to science.
I cannot believe you just spoke that blasphemy.  Hearing a voice actor butcher Calvin would have damaged my childhood.  Watterson is hands down the best comic strip artist, and writer, ever. Ugh, I just pictured some piece of shit snot nosed fourth grader running around the mall with a Calvin shirt and I wanted to punt him, like a football.  Which means I will need to  deliberately pick him up, and drop him onto my foot, gently cradling the base of his skull, just before my leg sharply launches the crying ragdoll into the air, where he will hopefully land in the cellphone kiosk.  *You* made me think that.
I still like Lil Wayne even though everyone else does now. I just don't feel as cool.
The biggest selling motor vehicle in history???
too poor to leave  Many mich folks have been leaving the country . . . at least many of the ones I know.  The dollar drop alone was enough of a signal to make them think there could be big problems ahead.
From the Internet archive: http://web.archive.org/web/20000621222854/http://drudgereport.com/  So, it looks like this might well be true.  
I just went and read the actual text of the bill.  To my complete and utter non-astonishment, the submitted article grossly misrepresents what the bill calls for.
Try [Factor](http://factorcode.org).  It has most of the good features of Lisp but without as many parentheses.  Also, the guy who developed Lisp actually had an alternate syntax that wasn't used.
Good.
I like my cell phone because my family is all over the place and on different time zones.  My husband can catch me right after work when he gets a morale call; I can call my mother (or my little boy, if he's out East for the summer) on a lunch break without worrying about the long distance.
&gt;Much worse? How about this, the kids don't invite that kid to their birthday, but everyone else gets to go. That sounds soooo terrible, we better stop it!  You can live in denial if you want but trust me those kids will find a way to punish the birthday boy. It will be bad too.  &gt;I believe in practicing the way you play, when you are a kid you are practicing to be an adult.   Do you also believe in pink unicorns?  &gt;If you make kids live under draconian laws and teach them disinformation and keep them handled, they grow up to be adults who are comfortable under draconian laws and being kept handled.  You teach them that there are rules to be followed.   Well not you of course. I am talking in general here. You specifically teach them that the strongest should survive and that kinds can not rely on structure to protect themselves. You want to teach them to take things into their own hands every time they feel slighted.
&gt;Firstly, they aren't my vids.  Ok.  &gt;Secondly, they were the highest rated vids for the songs that were suggested to me on Youtube, indicating that fans obviously like them and think they are an accurate representation of the bands live sound.  Tool fans are often rabid and will give 5 stars to just about any Tool video. For live accuracy, I refer to what Tool has released - namely, the live tracks off Salival and Opiate. Since Opiate is more of a raw album, it will show more of Maynard's ability to scream/be strong/loud/whatever. I actually listened to it earlier today and his voice sounded pretty darn good.  &gt;I'll believe that one as fast as I'll believe that you have a piece of property in a swamp that's sturdy to build on.  I have no vested interest in changing your mind.  &gt;If you feel he has talent, what do you believe his strong points to be and please point me to some media that would accurately represent it.  Listen to "Cold and Ugly" and "Jerk-Off" on Opiate. I think he has lots of strong points, many of which aren't applicable here because you are interested in "strength."
How do we know you didn't just change his Wikipedia page?
Yep.
Aw man, I loved this show when I was a teen! Thanks for reminding me about it. Great clip too!
Yup.
Lick me.
The title is factually correct.  They are all in the center to begin with. They only move right or left to get nominated.  The ones that didn't have to move from the center for the nomination never get nominated, and in reality never have an opportunity to move to the center.
Jaleel White played some basketball locally and thought he was was cool. He was not as cool as he thought.
apparently....but they even manage to make a mockery of that.  Pangea...in the last 10 thousand years?  If the continents were moving that fast to have created the modern oceans, I guess I should start learning Chinese.  We Canucks will be sharing a border with them in no time.
I don't think so.  I read Garfield, but I don't find it funny at all.
